




  Pandey Dheeraj is Buying Nutanix Inc. (NASDAQ:NTNX) Shares - Small Cap Exclusive                 Pandey Dheeraj is Buying Nutanix Inc. (NASDAQ:NTNX) SharesHomeBusiness, News, TechnologyPandey Dheeraj is Buying Nutanix Inc. (NASDAQ:NTNX) Shares Pandey Dheeraj is Buying Nutanix Inc. (NASDAQ:NTNX) Shares April 26, 2017 |  0 |  Richard Schwarz | Business |  In a just published Form 13, filed with the US Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC), Nutanix Inc. (NASDAQ:NTNX) reported that Pandey Dheeraj has picked up 11,399,675 of common stock as of 2017-04-26.The acquisition brings the aggregate amount owned by Pandey Dheeraj to a total of 11,399,675 representing less than 7.9% stake in the company.For those not familiar with the company, Nutanix, Inc. is a United States-based company, which provides an enterprise cloud platform that converges silos of server, virtualization and storage into an integrated solution. The Company’s enterprise cloud platform connects to public cloud services. It has operations in the United States; Europe, the Middle East and Africa; Asia-Pacific, and Other Americas. Its solution consists of software product families, including Acropolis and Prism. Its solution is delivered on commodity x86 servers. Acropolis includes its Distributed Storage Fabric that delivers enterprise-grade data management features. Acropolis also includes a built-in hypervisor, and its Application Mobility Fabric that enables application placement, conversion and migration across various hypervisors, and between public and private clouds. Prism delivers integrated virtualization and infrastructure management, operational analytics and a suite of one-click administration capabilities..A glance at Nutanix Inc. (NASDAQ:NTNX)’s key stats reveals a current market capitalization of 2.28 Billion based on 143.21 Million shares outstanding and a price at last close of $15.70 per share.Looking at insider activity, there are a few transactions worth noting.Specifically, on 2016-10-27, Canada picked up 112,693 at a purchase price of $27.64. This brings their total holding to 2,612,700 as of the date of the filing.On the sell side, the most recent transaction saw Lightspeed unload 29,590 shares at a sale price of $18.10. This brings their total holding to 0.It’s possible to gauge a company’s potential by tracking the activity of its major holders, as well as checking in on insider activity such as those transactions listed above. We’ll be keeping an eye on Nutanix Inc. (NASDAQ:NTNX) as things move forward to see if its progress aligns with these transactions.Subscribe below and we’ll keep you on top of what’s happening before it moves markets.    Tags cloud based services enterprise cloud platform NASDAQ:NTNX technology SHARE :  Richard Schwarz  Richard Schwarz is a veteran analyst in the small cap space, with a particular focus on the development stage biotech sector. He is a native of Canada, and attended NYU before working for a host of big name pharma outfits.Related Post:   Here’s How And Why BREAKING DATA CORP COM NPV (OTCMKTS:BKDCF) Is Dominating The Online Media Space     July 25, 2017    0    Almost Bitcoin, Bitcoin Investment Trust (OTCMKTS:GBTC)     June 20, 2017    0    (OTCMKTS:BTCS) BTCS Inc. & Blockchain     June 19, 2017    0    Here’s Who Just Picked Up China Fund Inc. (NYSE:CHN) Shares     April 27, 2017    0 Leave a Reply Cancel replyYour email address will not be published. Required fields are marked *CommentName * Email * Website   Top Brokers  Review Trade Now  ReviewTrade Now  ReviewTrade NowPromotionCopyright 2016 - All Rights ReservedTOPEnter your name and email and get the weekly newsletter... it's FREE!Introduce yourself and your programYour information will *never* be shared or sold to a 3rd party.  






Nutanix CEO Pandey talks Google, cloud journey, HCI rivals






















































SearchConvergedInfrastructure







Search the TechTarget Network














News
Stay informed about the latest enterprise technology news and product updates.

Nutanix CEO Pandey talks Google, cloud journey, HCI rivals


  














					byDave Raffo

Editorial Director

















CEO Dheeraj Pandey on Nutanix HCI: large server vendors were late to hyper-converged, and now the focus has shifted to building hybrid clouds across data centers.













Share this item with your network:






























			Related Content


Nutanix DEMO Lab video, from BriForum London 2012
– BrianMadden


Nutanix Xi Cloud Services revealed at Nutanix .NEXT ...
– SearchConvergedInfrastructure


Nutanix offers scale-out storage options for its ...
– SearchConvergedInfrastructure





































At the Nutanix .NEXT 2017 user conference, hyper-converged pioneer Nutanix took its next steps toward becoming...



Sign in for existing members




Continue Reading This Article
Enjoy this article as well as all of our content, including E-Guides, news, tips and more.



      Step 2 of 2:
     










You forgot to provide an Email Address.
This email address doesn’t appear to be valid.
This email address is already registered. Please login.
You have exceeded the maximum character limit.
Please provide a Corporate E-mail Address.





By submitting my Email address I confirm that I have read and accepted the Terms of Use and Declaration of Consent.





 By submitting your personal information, you agree that TechTarget and its partners may contact you regarding relevant content, products and special offers. 


 You also agree that your personal information may be transferred and processed in the United States, and that you have read and agree to the Terms of Use and the Privacy Policy. 









an enterprise cloud vendor. Nutanix revealed a partnership with Google around its new Xi Cloud Services and Calm orchestration software and outlined other pieces of its cloud strategy.








"Hyper-convergence is just a pit stop on the journey," Nutanix CEO and founder Dheeraj Pandey said of the evolution.
We spoke with Pandey at the conference, and the Nutanix CEO elaborated on what the Google partnership can do for Nutanix, why the hybrid cloud is another form of convergence and how running a public company is like "a marathon of sprints."
What role will Google play in Nutanix Xi Cloud Services?
Dheeraj Pandey: It's about making hybrid invisible. How do you make hybrid cloud a true hybrid cloud so that it doesn't sound like converged infrastructure?

Dheeraj Pandey

Because hybrid can be extremely hacked up, the way converged infrastructure was hacked up. We had a purist's view on what converged meant because it was all about software and running on homogenous x86 servers. It started on compute and storage, but then we added virtualization, we added networking and security. 
So that journey has to continue. We're seeing that we now need to converge two different things, and they don't need to be hardware boxes. They happen to be data centers. One of them is owned by us, the other one is not owned by us. That's how Xi was born. Then the question was, how do we execute in Xi?

The Google partnership came along just at the right time. We said, rather than going it alone and learning about security and geographic distribution and dark fiber networks, how about we actually double down with a really good partner who understands these things really well? And [who] also has a very good handle on high-level [platform as a service] PaaS that they're working with developers on. And that will basically bring a cloud that is both PaaS and [infrastructure as a service] IaaS because just simply infrastructure by itself is interesting, but not complete.
What, specifically, will you do with Google technology?
Pandey: We will take Kubernetes, for example, and try to make it a hybrid cloud API. Now, what does that mean? Kubernetes right now is focused on containers. We will obviously make it run both in private and public clouds, but we'll also make it work between containers and virtual machines. You have to hybridize that as well. And Calm becomes that place.
Calm can be used to hybridize the experience between containers and virtual machines in private and public clouds.
If you can implement Xi inside Google Cloud Platform, then it's a win for both sides.
Will Google host Xi or will you maintain your own cloud, as well?
Pandey: Well, we're not exclusive with Google, so we'll continue to do our own things, as well. But we can actually learn what Google is very good at because there's an architecture thing here about whether we can just use the POPs [points of presence] to just backhaul everything to a large data center, or do we need or have smaller data centers in the metros? These cloud architecture discussions will clarify what you just asked.
You said you had a different take on converged infrastructure from the start. Do you see the early converged infrastructure vendors now sharing your vision?
Pandey: Of course. The thing is, they've come to hyper-convergence after four or five years, and the ball has moved yet again to hybrid clouds. Hyper-convergence is just a pit stop on the journey. It's really about software and operating systems. It's about being able to blend as many things as possible, and public cloud is one thing that cannot be a silo.
With everyone getting into hyper-converged, do you have to keep the ball moving to stay ahead?
Pandey: There's no finish line in the journey for companies that believe in innovation.



   [Server vendors] have come to hyper-convergence after four or five years, and the ball has moved yet again to hybrid clouds. It's really about software and operating systems.
  

Dheeraj PandeyNutanix CEO and founder
  



You do the iPod, then you do the iPhone, then you do the iPad, then you do the iWatch, and you do the macOS; there's no finish line. Then you do the new Siri, then you need to do the car.
Microsoft went through this, too; you first went against Lotus, then you went against Novell, then you went against PC players, then you went against Oracle, and on and on and on.
At .NEXT last year, Nutanix was still waiting to go public. After a long wait, you finally completed your initial public offering last September. How has going public changed Nutanix and your job as Nutanix CEO?
Pandey: In many ways, it hasn't changed us, and in some ways, it has. We can't be confused about who we want to be. We are still a growth player. We are still about innovation. We are still about disrupting the incumbency, and that hasn't changed being private or being public.
Wall Street won't force us into something else. Only when something stops working because they don't see innovation, when they don't see modernization of research and development, will they say, 'look, if your strategy's not working, you better use my strategy.'
For a young public company, sometimes it only takes one bad quarter for that to happen.
Pandey: To me, Wall Street is like strict parents. If you do a good job, then they'll let you be, and they want you to be a better company every day. That's the way the board has been for this company the last seven or eight years. All they're saying is 'when you're building your company, make it a marathon of sprints. Every quarter is a sprint, so make it a marathon of sprints. I'm not going to get in the way of your marathon vision, but don't lose track of the sprint model.'
By the way, that's where development is headed. Agile development is about sprints. Engineers are impatient: I can't wait two years to release my code. Therefore, there are sprint models in Agile development. Every quarter of financial reporting, that scrum is that Agile development that we're actually doing in some sense. People bemoan quarterly milestones, but at the end of the day, that's what we're expecting our engineers to do.
What is your marathon vision as the Nutanix CEO?
Pandey: From very early on we have been clear and had the conviction for what the architect of computing needs to be. Many others bent over backwards with VMware. We didn't.
When everyone was building a tab in vCenter, we built Prism. We said that's the way we need to rearchitect the data center. It was bold and audacious. We don't have to bend over backwards. We have to have respectful discussions on strategy, and that's what we're having with Wall Street right now.
If our strategies work, if our research and development is monetizing and we are growing at the rate we're spending, then we'll be fine. If we start spending more than we grow, they'll ask questions.
On the business side, you must spend a lot of time managing relationships with server vendors. You have partnerships with all the major vendors or their resellers, yet they all sell hyper-converged appliances that compete with Nutanix.
Pandey: Apart from Dell EMC, which owns VMware at an arm's length, none of the other server companies have an operating system. They own a hardware company and they need an OS. The only OSes they can find are VMware, Microsoft and Nutanix.
As with most things in life, you focus on the overlapping interests and don't focus on the negative part, which is the conflict of interests. And that's how a community of nations operates. You can't be complete friends, you can't be complete enemies. You have your own interests. You focus on the overlaps.
You have no formal partnership with Cisco, and it sells a hyper-converged system, but resellers sell your software on its Unified Computing System. Can you see a formal partnership developing with Cisco?
Pandey: I never say never. Some of our large customers experience our software on Cisco hardware in production. So Cisco is now hearing from the grassroots, 'this thing is good and it's working,' and the more they listen to their customers, the higher the probability of us working together in an official partnership.
But I can't give you a date, I can't give you a time. We're in this negotiation process where the market forces will tell them, 'This is a good thing.'
Do you see Nutanix ever getting to the point where you only sell software on other vendors' hardware instead of on your own appliance?
Pandey: I don't think we'll ever abandon the appliance. That reference design keeps everybody honest in terms of how hardware and software comes together. It shows how they should behave, shows us the failure rates.
Without hardware, we could not build Xi. Xi is end to end; it's not just software running in the ether. It needs silicon. That's what our appliances give us. If we didn't know how to support all that, it would have been way harder to build Xi.
Hyper-converged users who don't buy Nutanix often say it's because Nutanix costs too much. How do you respond to potential customers scared off by price. 
Pandey: I think people focus too much on hardware. They focus on Capex when they really should focus on working the whole body; what we call the cost of ownership. The hardware players want to provide cheap hardware, but then they charge a ton of money for services and support and things that come afterwards. We, on the other hand, believe a lot in automation [and] a lot in one-click experiences. That innovation comes upfront.
These days, we have so many different pricing models. We have subscription pricing, and Xi is another form of that. People don't have to look at it as Capex.
By the way, hardware vendors can't sell it that way unless you lease from them. But leasing is a hack actually. You really need a multi-tenant architecture, which is what the cloud provides.
But we don't talk about the cost of the hardware by itself. We talk about how many people will be required, how we'll provide you support for application, security, networking and migration. We've written so many tools that we give out for free; migration tools, testing tools, sizing tools. That stuff costs money to develop, and we don't charge anything for these tools.
Do you have a pricing model yet for Xi?
Pandey: It will come out [in the] next few months. But it definitely will be a consumption model-based approach. Not on cores because they don't see the cores; those are multi-tenant cores. It will be based on things they see, the consumed number of VMs [virtual machines], size of the VMs and storage. 


Next Steps
Data centers can thrive when using hyper-converged infrastructure
Converged infrastructure and reference architecture are not the same
Storage is one winner as convergence meets the data center





Dig Deeper on Hyper-Converged Vendors and Products




									All




									News




									Get Started




									Evaluate




									Manage




									Problem Solve








Ready for hyper-converged infrastructure appliances?



NetApp HCI: Kind of, sort of, but not really hyper-converged



Red Hat Hyperconverged Infrastructure joins the parade



NetApp HCI system brings vendor belatedly into hyper-convergence




							Load More



										View All






Red Hat Hyperconverged Infrastructure joins the parade



NetApp HCI system brings vendor belatedly into hyper-convergence



Dell EMC World 2017: XC, VxRail sold in coopetition



HPE pays $650 million for SimpliVity hyper-convergence




							Load More



										View All News






Pivot3



Stratoscale



Unisys



Lenovo Converged HX series




							Load More



										View All Get started






Ready for hyper-converged infrastructure appliances?



NetApp HCI: Kind of, sort of, but not really hyper-converged



Seven hyper-converged software options for DIY HCI



Hyper-converged technology lock-in: Good, bad or indifferent?




							Load More



										View All Evaluate






Ready for hyper-converged infrastructure appliances?



How to approach hyper-converged architecture vendors and lock-in



Hyper-converged technology lock-in: Good, bad or indifferent?



IT infrastructure costs can add up with hyper-converged systems




							Load More



										View All Manage






How can I fix VSAN performance problems?



Are there guidelines for determining if VMware vSAN is right for us?






										View All Problem solve









PRO+
Content
Find more PRO+ content and other member only offers, here.







E-Handbook
How to approach hyper-converged architecture vendors and lock-in














Dave Raffo asks:
Do you think its early mover status in hyper-convergence will help Nutanix HCI as an enterprise cloud player?



Join the Discussion




















				Join the conversation


1 comment




						Send me notifications when other members comment.
Add My Comment




Register







Login


Forgot your password?





Forgot your password?

No problem! Submit your e-mail address below. We'll send you an email containing your password.




Submit







Your password has been sent to:




By submitting you agree to receive email from TechTarget and its partners. If you reside outside of the United States, you consent to having your personal data transferred to and processed in the United States. Privacy







Please create a username to comment.








Oldest 
Newest 






[-]



Dave Raffo
 - 3 Jul 2017 12:54 PM

Do you think its early mover status in hyper-convergence will help Nutanix HCI as an enterprise cloud player?



Add My Comment
Cancel





  
















-ADS BY GOOGLE














SearchDataCenter




IBM Strategic Imperatives mark a transition into software and services
IBM's Strategic Imperatives are slowly morphing the server hardware stalwart into a software and services company. But IBM still ...



Data center acquisitions can cause price and services upheaval
Enterprises that rent racks inside one of the many data centers that have changed hands in 2017 should carefully evaluate changes...



Redfish server management gets vendors' nod in new server hardware
Vendors are keen to push their own server management tools with extra capabilities, but they lack the cross-vendor capabilities ...






SearchCloudStorage




Ctera Networks' file-sharing services gain intelligent cache
The latest version of Ctera's file-sharing software takes the sync out of sync-and-share with intelligent caching built into ...



Everything you need to know about OpenStack modules
OpenStack continues to evolve in an effort to compete with AWS. The modules that are available now make OpenStack a viable ...



Scality launches Zenko for multi-cloud management
Scality's new open source initiative is a multi-cloud management vision to help customers match specific workloads to the best ...






SearchStorage




Red Hat Ceph, Gluster roadmaps focus on HCI, containers
Red Hat's Ceph and Gluster storage roadmaps reflect increased focus on hyper-converged infrastructure, containers and big data, ...



TrueNAS X10: iXsystems' open source storage contender
The TrueNAS X10 entry-level hybrid array from iXsystems provides a low-cost alternative to legacy arrays. The unified array ...



New WekaIO file system incorporates flash, object store
WekaIO launched its scale-out file system, which is optimized for server-based flash storage and designed to tier data to cheaper...






SearchNetworking




Savvius Spotlight network traffic monitoring tool launches
Savvius Spotlight, a new network traffic monitoring tool, launches; ManageEngine boosts its endpoint monitoring; and Cisco ...



Update expands Mist Wi-Fi management platform use cases
The latest update to the Mist Wi-Fi management platform makes it more useful for divvying up network access in hotels, college ...



Arista Universal Spine lands Network Innovation Award
This month's Network Innovation Award goes to Arista Universal Spine and the technology behind the architecture.






SearchVMware




Use the Rufus utility to create a bootable VMware ESXi installer
Rufus -- short for Reliable USB Formatting Utility -- is a free Windows tool that can create a bootable VMware ESXi installer and...



VMware cloud strategy claims new territory with Wavefront acquisition
A year into its AWS partnership, VMware looks to keep its cloud momentum by purchasing Wavefront, the leading cross-cloud ...



Set up the VMware vCenter Server Appliance with Mac or Linux
The vSphere Web Client has long stood in the way of Linux administrators who wish to set up vCSA. Fortunately, vSphere versions ...

































Close







Nutanix's (NTNX) CEO Dheeraj Pandey on Q3 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Nutanix's (NTNX) CEO Dheeraj Pandey on Q3 2017 Results - Earnings Call TranscriptMay.25.17 | About: Nutanix (NTNX) Nutanix, Inc. (NASDAQ:NTNX)
Q3 2017 Earnings Conference Call
May 26, 2017, 4:30 PM ET
Executives
Tonya Chin - Senior Director of Investor Relations
Dheeraj Pandey - Founder, Chief Executive Officer and Chairman
Duston Williams - Chief Financial Officer
Analysts
Kulbinder Garcha - Credit Suisse
Jason Ader - William Blair
Wamsi Mohan - Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Simona Jankowski - Goldman Sachs
Alex Kurtz - Pacific Crest Securities
Matthew Hedberg - RBC Capital Markets
Mark Murphy - J.P. Morgan
Katy Huberty - Morgan Stanley
Aaron Rakers - Stifel Nicolaus
Jayson Noland - Robert W. Baird 
Andrew Nowinski - Piper Jaffray
Operator
Good afternoon. My name is Mike and I will be your conference operator today. At this time I would like to welcome everyone to the Nutanix Q3 Fiscal 2017 Earnings Call. All lines have been placed on mute to prevent any background noise. After the speakers’ remarks, there will be a question-and-answer session. [Operator Instructions]
I will now turn the call over to Tonya Chin, Senior Director of Investor Relations. You may begin your conference.
Tonya Chin
Good afternoon and welcome to today’s conference call to discuss the results of our third quarter of fiscal year 2017. This call is also being broadcast live over the web, and can be accessed in the Investor Relations section of the Nutanix website. Joining me today are Dheeraj Pandey, Nutanix’s CEO; and Duston Williams, Chief Financial Officer. 
After the market closed today, Nutanix issued a press release announcing the financial results for its third quarter of fiscal 2017. If you’d like a copy of the release, you can access it in the Investor Relations section of the Company’s website.
We would like to remind you that during today’s call management may make forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Safe Harbor provisions of federal securities laws, regarding the company’s anticipated future revenues, gross margins, operating expenses, net loss, loss per share, free cash flow, business plans and objectives, product features, technology that is under development, competitive and industry dynamics, changes in sales productivity, expectations regarding increasing software sales, future pricing of certain components of our solutions, our plans regarding the adoption of new revenue recognition standards, potential market opportunities and other financial and business-related information.
These forward-looking statements involve a number of risks and uncertainties, some of which are beyond our control, which could cause actual results to differ materially and adversely from those anticipated by these statements. These forward-looking statements apply as of today and you should not rely on them as representing our views in the future. We undertake no obligation to update these statements after this call.
For a more detailed description of these risks and uncertainties, please refer to our quarterly report on Form 10-Q for the second quarter of fiscal 2017 filed with the SEC on March 10, 2017, as well as our earnings release posted a few minutes ago on our website. Copies of these documents may be obtained from the SEC or by visiting the Investor Relations section of our website.
Also please note that, unless otherwise specifically referenced, all financial measures we use on this call are expressed on a non-GAAP basis and have been adjusted to exclude certain charges. We have provided reconciliations of these non-GAAP financial measures to GAAP financial measures in the Investor Relations section of our website and in our earnings press release.
Now, I’ll turn it over to Dheeraj Pandey, CEO of Nutanix. Dheeraj?
Dheeraj Pandey
Thank you, Tonya, and hi everyone. Thank you for dialing in. I am very pleased to report that we had a great quarter with record revenues of $192 million that were above street consensus and our guided range growing 67% year-over-year. We were also pleased to see our North America business return to strong growth in addition to continued solid performances from EMEA and APAC. 

Third quarter billings were $234 million, up 47% year-over-year. Gross margins came in slightly above expectations and our EPS performance was better than our guided range beating consensus by $0.03. Our focus on driving sustained growth continued during the quarter driven by strong repeat business which represented 71% of our third quarter bookings also owing to strong momentum in large deals. 
This demonstrates steady progress on deepening and extending our existing relationships with customers, particularly in the Global 2000. Our concentration on increasing our number of large deals paid off with two deals greater than $5 million in the quarter and 34 deals greater than $1 million. Further we reached a major milestone with our largest customer crossing $50 million in lifetime sales and still growing strong.
And while we made great progress expanding further into existing accounts in Q3, we also sold into 790 new customers in the quarter including nearly 50 new Global 2000 customers. This brings our total customer count to over 6170. Our OEM partners Dell and Lenovo contributed well to our new Global 2000 customer acquisitions complementing a strong number of additions on the NX platform.
AHV hypervisor adoption continued to increase its 23% of nodes sold using our own built-in hypervisor, up from 21% last quarter and 9% a year ago based on a rolling full quarter average. Our full stack operating system story including our AHV hypervisor, our operations management software, Prism Pro and our highly portable and multi-hypervisor multi-hardware stack continues to be a significant differentiator in our enterprise sales motion.
Last quarter we discussed some changes we were making in our sales organization to sharpen our focus on larger accounts. This process was a necessary part of our sales team evolution in critical and our next phase of growth as we target our next billion in billings. We are pleased to report that we made very solid progress during the quarter with strong execution in hirings, and alignment across our sales team, particularly in North America, where most of the changes were made. 
We have hired several new team members with a focus exclusively on very large enterprise accounts and we continue to hire in support of these sales objectives in the coming months. In addition to executing on our planned adjustments to the sales organization, we further expanded our market opportunity, but also extending hardware choice to enterprise cloud builders with several product announcements. 
Our software was initially filled with Nutanix sourced industry standard x86 server. Since then we steadily increased hardware platform choice for our customers adding Dell, Lenovo, and Cisco UCS C-Series servers. 
During the quarter, we continued to deliver on this commitment to offering customers the broadest choice of hardware for their enterprise cloud deployments and announced three new supported hardware platforms. First, we announced term-based licenses of our Nutanix enterprise cloud platform software for Hewlett Packard Enterprises ProLiant servers and Cisco UCS B-Series blade servers. 
We also signed a multi-year agreement with IBM to combine our enterprise cloud operating system with IBM’s power systems to deliver the industry’s first non-x86 hyperconverged solution targeting cognitive applications and big data workloads in large enterprises. The solution will be sold to IBM and their partners exclusively in feature AHV hypervisor. 
These new supported hardware options will broaden the deployment potential of Nutanix beyond our current hardware partners to a large population of HP E ProLiant and Cisco UCS servers already used in enterprise datacenters, as well as to highest end power-based applications in the large enterprise. 

Operating systems are all about ubiquity in APIs. Our software now runs in a large population of Intel x86 servers, IOT scale Intel servers and palm sized form-factors ruggedized military equipment like Crystal and Klas and soon-to-be-released IBM power servers. We have made great strides with APIs to build an ecosystem of networking, storage, security and management software partners, many of whom will be part of our .NEXT User Conference in Washington D.C. on June 28.
Today approximately 50% of our Q3 new customer workloads are considered tier-1 business-critical applications including Microsoft’s SQL server, Oracle, SAP, Microsoft Exchange, Hadoop and Splunk. Legacy vendors typically our biggest naysayers would want to think otherwise, but any new architecture that changes the consumption model has had the right of passage similar to ours. 
Our solutions have strong credibility in the enterprise with our growing number of Global 2000 customers today numbering approximately 520; continue to expand the mission-critical workloads with us. We frequently see customers start with one workload as a trial, or beachhead and quickly add workloads over time. A great example of workload progression within the customer was a large deal in the quarter, a very large US retailer doing well over $15 billion in annual sales in over 1000 stores for the United States. 
Our relationship with this customer is a perfect illustration of how we expand in an account over time. Two years ago, we began our relationship with a large-scale virtual desktop infrastructure which essentially takes Windows desktop to a cloud environment after proving the ease of use and the performance of our solution, this customer quickly began standardizing our platform adding new workloads every few months. Today, Nutanix is deployed across all their major datacenters and the continued purchase pattern culminated in one of the largest commercial deals in the history of our company in Q3. 
Another great example of continued workload progression is with a global advanced wound care company with whom we signed a greater than $1 million expansion deal in the quarter. This customer started using our solution for its remote office applications and then added to the Nutanix cluster for disaster recovery. 
Over time, this customer has grown their engagement to include our full stack solution including AHV for the core server virtualization. Another very large deal in the quarter was with a Global 2000 customer that is one of the largest cellphone carriers in the US with over 50,000 employees and over $30 billion in annual revenue. 
This was an expansion that encompassed a number of workloads including a large-scale VDI deployment and a large big data workload driven by our Web-Scale architecture and the cloud-like simplicity of our solution. 
We also had a great competitive win against legacy conversion infrastructure in a multi-million dollar expansion deal with a Global 2000 customer based in our EMEA region, a multi-national asset manager with over 4000 worldwide employees whose opportunity encompass both VDI expansion and a large big data cluster. 
In addition to increasing our footprint within many large customers in the quarter, we also signed a number of large new customers in the quarter with many new deals greater than $1 million. A good example of this was our largest new customer in Q3, a Global 2000 customer that is one of the largest global stock exchanges based outside of the US. 
Our strong history of quickly extending customer engagements beyond the first workload gives us confidence that we will grow this and many of this for our new customer relationships over time. We also continued to see customers recognizing that certain workloads having been moved to the public cloud a better managed on prem. 

For example in Q3, the largest ecommerce company in Indonesia that had formally elected to run their marketplace in the public cloud moved its mission-critical workload back for cost and performance reasons on prem to our enterprise cloud powered by AHV. 
The competitive landscape has grown over the past few quarters but we continue to perform very well against competition with strong win rates. For example, during the quarter we signed a large deal with a Global 2000 customer that is one of the largest European based brewing companies and a household name. 
This customer selected Nutanix for their Oracle workload and a competitive win with AHV being a very significant factor in the customer’s decision. We had a very similar win with an Oracle workload in AHV at one of the largest medical supply companies in the US. 
Our OEM partner Lenovo contributed to our Global 2000 penetration closing a new logo together with us marking their largest ever deal with Nutanix. The customer large US based brokerage firm with over $3 billion in annual revenue selected Nutanix in a competitive win against the traditional hypervisor stack. 
Scalability remains a significant differentiator for our operating system, but chosen our ability to manage and grow very large customers. We are very pleased with the number of customers that have grown this footprint with us and standardize their datacenters around our operating system. In fact, we have 269 customers that have purchased between $1 million and $3 million, 40 customers that have purchased between $3 million and $5 million, and 32 customers that have purchased over $5 million with us lifetime to-date.
Now let me share one final example. We have shared that choice of hardware for a customer is a significant part of our growth opportunity. In Q3, we closed a large software deal running on Cisco with a Global 2000 customer offering wireless and ISP services towards 50 million customers in the US. The new solution which will run Nutanix and UCS blades will allow the customer to reduce the size of its cluster from 700 to 100 nodes utilizing our technology delivering significant ROI for them. 
The enterprise cloud market is growing faster than anyone imagine. Gartner estimates in its mail report forecast analysis, worldwide integrated systems, 1Q 2017 update hyperconverged integrated systems that the hyperconverged market will grow to approximately $8.5 billion plus in 2020. We believe this predicted growth is read forth by the fact that Nutanix solutions are powering more and more workloads in our customers’ environments including Oracle, SAP and Microsoft business applications and databases. 
This is a very healthy backdrop for us to continue our strong growth by executing on our strategy. While many of our me-too competitors read the form-factor of hyperconvergence as a destination, we are focusing on an operating system which will holistically replatform the enterprise datacenter. Top down consumption of infrastructure is key to our vision which is why we are so focused on developer interfaces such as self-service portals and application-centric automation. 
We continue to build with ubiquity by offering customers’ choice of hardware, choice of hypervisor, and choice of public cloud providers for secondary storage, all managed by a single controlled plane of prism. Building an operating system is a journey and no more than one or two are successful each decade. It requires an immense focus in applications, interoperability, performance, security, automation and reliability and to make it all ubiquitous, that is location agnostic is the biggest engineering challenge. 
We remain extremely focused in investing in customer service and product engineering to maintain our lead as we rearchitect the enterprise. The hybrid enterprise is the final frontier. 

With that, I will turn the call over to Duston for a more detailed review of our Q3 results. Duston?
Duston Williams
Thank you, Dheeraj. For the 23rd consecutive quarter, dating back to our first quarter of shipment, we delivered record revenue in Q3 above our target range. This performance along with gross margins that was slightly better than expected resulted in non-GAAP EPS that also exceeded our expectations. 
Revenue for the third quarter was $192 million growing 67% from the year ago and up 5% from the previous quarter. We billed $234 million for the quarter representing a 47% increase from a year ago and a 3% increase from the prior quarter. We also rebuilt a significant amount of backlog during the quarter. Notably, our Dell OEM business accounted for over 20% of our ending backlog.
On a sequential basis, our Dell bookings declined in Q3 by roughly the same percentage decline that we experienced in Q3 of 2016 as Dell’s fiscal year end occurs in January. Our Lenovo bookings increased sharply in Q3. 
As Dheeraj mentioned, although we have the required execution ahead of us when it comes to sales segmentation, we were very pleased with the rebound we experienced in our large deal activity. Again, just for clarity, we define large deals as customers purchasing more than $500,000 in any given quarter. 
As you may recall, during our Q2 earnings call, we mentioned the following three datapoints: First, we stated that over the last four quarters deals exceeding $500,000 averaged about 45% of total bookings. Second, we noted that in Q2, we performed somewhat below this level, primarily in North America and lastly, we predicted that the North America productivity would rebound over the next few quarters as a result of our planned sales adjustment. 
I am pleased to report that not only the big deals as a percent of total bookings rebound back to around historical levels in Q3, but specifically the North American productivity recovered nicely during the quarter. In fact, the North American sales rep productivity for ramped reps was the strongest performance we have seen since fiscal Q4 2016. 
As you may recall, we also are committed to provide investors with some additional datapoints to illustrate our progress in growing our large deals as a percent of our total business. The following datapoint sheds some light on our Q3 large deal activity, Global 2000 customer traction, as well as additional insight into a couple of our software-only deals. 
You should not expect this level of detail on an ongoing basis. First, let me review some of the detail on our large deal activity. In Q3, we executed 13 deals, greater than $2 million in bookings for a total of $45 million in bookings compared to only four deals greater than $2 million in the second quarter.
Notably, of these 13 deals, ten of them either included no VDI or included other workloads in addition to VDI. Of the 13 deals greater than $2 million in Q3, eight were Global 2000 companies and four were large government agencies, three of these deals were to new customers and the two largest deals approximated $7 million each. Comparatively, there was only one Global 2000 customer included in the Q2 deal greater than $2 million in bookings. 
Now little bit further insight into our Global 2000 activity. We had a record Global 2000 in Q3. Our Global 2000 bookings in Q3 were 50% greater than in any previous quarter. Global 2000 bookings as a percent of total bookings was the highest it has been in over two years. In Q3, 20 Global 2000 customers made purchases of greater than $1 million versus ten in Q2. 
Of these 20 Global 2000 customers that made purchases of greater than $1 million, 70% of them either included no VDI or included other workloads in addition to VDI. Almost 50% of our existing Global 2000 customer base made repeat purchases in Q3 illustrating the continued success of land and expand strategy. 

And in Q3, the average repeat purchase amount for Global 2000 customers was more than 3x of that of our non-Global 2000 customers. We continue to focus on increasing software sales as a percent of our total product sales in addition to generating software bookings from our two OEM partners and from premium software additions. 
I’ll next provide a few highlights regarding a couple of our other software-only transactions in Q3. We completed two ELA deals with Fortune 500 companies, each with a 100 or more nodes and both representing repeat ELA purchases. We’ve booked many term license deals for the Nutanix software running on Cisco UCS and we completed an initial $800,000 software-only deal running on a specialized defense-related hardware platform. 
As I mentioned earlier, we are very pleased with the Q3 performance surrounding our large deal activity, as well as our Global 2000 business. We realize we have more work ahead of us, but it is very clear that our focused efforts around large deals and driving further Global 2000 penetration is yielding positive results. 
As expected in Q3, our percentage of international bookings decreased from 48% in Q2 2017 to 38% in Q3 2017, compared to 33% in Q3 2016. Our bill-to-revenue ratio was 1.22 times, which is slightly lower than the estimated range of 1.25 to 1.3. Based on our current projections, we expect Q4 to be around 1.25 times. Our gross margin for the quarter was 58.4%, which was slightly higher than our guidance and compares to 62.5% in the year ago quarter and 59.8% in the prior quarter.
We were pleased with the limited success with the price increases we enacted in Q3 to counteract DRAM cost increases. As expected, DRAM and NAND related SSD costs continued to rise causing our product cost to increase by about 8% during the quarter. Looking to Q4, we expect significant additional DRAM cost increases, while SSD cost increases should start to abate. 
I’ll touch on margins a bit more when I review the guidance for Q4. Our operating expenses were $171 million and were in line with our guidance. Although the anticipated headcount increases in Q4 and Q1 2018 will be lower than historical rates, we want to be clear that operating expenses are expected to increase by a minimum of $10 million per quarter over the next few quarters. 
With an eye focused on continued top-line acceleration, additional spending will be funneled to demand generation investments with a majority targeting large customer opportunity. We had a non-GAAP net loss of $61 million or $0.42 per share. 
I’ll next provide a few balance sheet highlights along with a few other key performance metrics. We closed the quarter with cash and cash equivalents of $350 million that was down from $355 million in the prior quarter. DSOs on a straight average was 79 days, three days higher than the 76 days reported in the prior quarter. 
The weighted average DSO reflecting the period in average receivables outstanding was 23 days in Q3 versus 24 in the prior quarter. We used $16 million of cash flow from operations. As you may recall, the Q2 cash flow from operations benefited by $10 million from ESPP contributions. The Q3 cash flow from operations was negatively impacted by the same $10 million as shares repurchased under the ESPP. 
Year-to-date fiscal 2017, we have generated a positive $8 million of cash flow from operations. We used $29 million in free cash flow during the quarter, although once again this was impacted by the $10 million of ESPP funding outflow. Software as a percent of total bookings based on a rolling four quarter average increased to 16%, up from 15% in Q2.
I’ll now touch on our guidance for the fourth quarter. Revenue to be between $215 million and $220 million, gross margins of approximately 58%, and a per share loss of around $0.38 using weighted average shares outstanding of approximately $152 million. 

Regarding gross margins, DRAM costs were once again increased substantially in Q4. All things being equal, this cost increase would push margins below their current level. However, we’ve set a target to hold margins at 58% and therefore we will alter our mix of software as needed to maintain this margin level.
It’s important to note that over the 12 month period ending July 31, 2017, our expected DRAM cost will have increased by nearly 100% resulting in a six percentage point impact to gross margin. Once DRAM cost start to decrease, we expect gross margins to rebound back to the 60% level. 
And then lastly, regarding the new revenue recognition standard, again known as ASC 606, it remains our preference to early adopt this new standard starting in August 2018 which is our fiscal Q1 2018, pending the resolution of a few open items. At that time, we expect to recast our historical financial statements and in Q3, under the new 606 standards based on a cost down estimate, gross margins would have been approximately 200 to 300 basis points higher than we reported under the current existing revenue standards.
Operator, if you now open the call up for questions, that’d be great. Thank you.
Question-and-Answer Session 
Operator 
[Operator Instructions] Your first question is from Kulbinder Garcha from Credit Suisse. 
Kulbinder Garcha 
Thank you. Just a couple of questions please. First of all, on gross margin, Duston, as we go forward, I understand the cost increases impacting the fourth quarter, but given the – software and the software license billings, should that taking going to be coming meaningfully against the next fiscal year or how should we think about the gross margin trend beyond just the next quarter? 
I mean, the other question is maybe a broader one for Dheeraj, just in terms of Dell, just remind me how big it is, which is revenues or billings in absolute and how is that relationship evolves and especially as the hypervisor you guys are selling gain traction? Many thanks.
Duston Williams
Yes, this is Duston. So, I’ll take probably both those, I guess. On the Dell piece, we haven’t broken that out typically. We said back in the IPO it is never been bigger than 15%. It’s a bit lower than that today as a percent of bookings and we’ve got Lenovo that’s also starting to accelerate there also. 
So we’ve got those two and then, to your point of all software here, Dheeraj mentioned HP which we will get up at the end of the year here and then additional servers from Cisco that would now qualify on. So there is lots of opportunities here to continue that software increase. 
Dheeraj Pandey
Hopefully, I think just one thing to add on Dell is that, Dell is an entire group called CPSD, Kulbinder, and our software with their hardware is a significant chunk of their annual sales quotas. So Dell is morphing its business from traditional treaty to the new architecture and the three operating systems, VMWare, Nutanix and even Microsoft Azure Stack, are all relevant go to market motions for them. But at the end of the day, we control our own destiny with our clients and we compete and cooperate with Dell on a deal-by-deal basis and show that we have multiple routes to market its software ELAs and subscription for SPs, Lenovo HX, Cisco UCS, and going forward HP and IBM as well. 
Kulbinder Garcha 
And just to clarify Duston, point on them, you said it’s 15% on load and 15% of bookings, that’s the comment just specific to Dell and your hope is as these other OEMs ramp up, that is just not your OEM revenues more diversified in 12 months time let’s say, is that how we should think about it?
Duston Williams
Yes, yes, that’s fair. Now, yes, it’s again, the only thing we said in the past is, it’s never been higher than 15% and it’s a bit below that today. On the gross margin question, Kulbinder, good question. As we go forward, two things happening, obviously, sooner or later, DRAM cost will turn back in our favor. So at some point, we will have that benefit. 

Today, we are still fighting it. And it continues to be a headwind there although we’ve taken a stance on margins as I said and we are just going to basically alter our mix of software to add a minimum to try to get to the 58% we guided. But going forward, we should have the DRAM cost coming back in line. Your point about more and more software is valid. 
And then, the model gets pretty interesting as we adopt 606 because the flexibility again from a software and a margin perspective becomes much greater and it will allow us even to play off additional margin growth with top-line growth. Again today, when we do an ELA, that all gets deferred and gets ratable over the support period, under 606, the license piece of that software will be a immediate hit to the revenue and gross margins along with the OEM revenues that we have today from Dell and Lenovo. 
Kulbinder Garcha 
And just in the near-term, have you changed your approach to hardware pricing? My understanding always was as your software content builds, you will continue to fairly aggressively price your hardware to drive adoption. Just in the near term, have you held back a little bit on that? Just is that in anyway impacting sales? 
Duston Williams
Not, not significantly, no, no and we’ve got a lot of flexibility in the model to do what we need to do there. We may tweak it a little bit this quarter for the 58% target. But it should not be substantial there. 
Kulbinder Garcha 
Okay, thank you.
Duston Williams
Yes, and again, that flexibility just wretches this up quite a bit once we adopt 606. 
Operator 
The next question is from Jason Ader from William Blair.
Jason Ader
Yes, thank you. Hey guys. A quick clarification and a question. Can you tell us how Dell did sequentially and was it a slight headwind? That’s the clarification and the question, talking to investors in recent weeks, it seems there is a growing anxt on the TAM ceiling from HCI that HCI is struggling to move up market because their performance challenges and mixed workload in larger scale environments. Where do you think this kind of story is coming from and can you help address that concern?
Dheeraj Pandey
Yes, I will take the second question, but you will take the first question and Dell sequential from their Q4 to Q1.
Duston Williams
Yes, if you look at the – and I mentioned this earlier, if you look at in our Q3 last year what Dell declined as a percent of our bookings and their bookings there. The decline quarter-over-quarter this year as compared to last year was pretty much exactly the same and I think maybe I’ll just head this question off, because we will have it in the future and we will open up a little bit here just because, when we file our Q, everybody typically looks to the receivable balances magically under happy to be on how it ended up this way with customer and anytime it’s over 10%, it’s shown in the Q there. 
Last quarter, I don’t know the exact number, I think it was around 11%. This quarter, I’ll just tell you what the number is because the questions will come up once we file the Q. It was roughly around 9%. So not too much difference there. It’s a down quarter. Couple of things you got to consider there also, when I mentioned backlog, we have built a significant amount of backlog, again 20% of that backlog related to Dell. 
So it’s obviously within backlog, it hasn’t been built and it hasn’t gotten into receivables, but I think you need to take that into consideration. And then, just quarter-over-quarter, the growth in the receivable balance itself this quarter grew roughly around 12% or 13%. I think if you go back to last quarter, it only grew maybe 3% or 4%. So, just some additional insights there to put that in perspective. 
Jason Ader
Okay, helpful.
Dheeraj Pandey

Thanks, Duston. And on the TAM question, Jason, think about Gartner in the last, probably year, year and a half, there is already masters and queue from converged infrastructure or integrated systems and a hyperconverged integrated systems is the TAM has gone from $3 billion to $6 billion to now $8.5 billion. 
What’s really happening is that the incumbent legacy vendors who are doing a controlled cannibalization of their legacy business, they are biggest naysayers of this V architecture. And the proliferate their nay saying to analysts and media. 
In my script I’ve talked about our ability to scale within the enterprise, just to reiterate, we have more than 265, almost 269 customers that have purchased over $1 million and $3 million, and 40 plus customers that have purchased in $3 million and $5 million and 32 customers that have purchased over $5 million with us lifetime. 
I talked about the customers that have more than $50 million results and many of them that are above $10 million and $20 million as well. And most of this has actually come in the last 24 months. If you take a look at JP Morgan CIO Survey 2017, Cloud Wars, the name is the Enterprise Strikes Back dated May 15, 2017, you will appreciate our seat at the table in the large enterprise, because there is so much going in terms of rearchitecture in the large enterprise. 
And TAM is a function of workloads, hardware platform, diversity and form-factors, people said similar things about virtualization in public clouds as well. If you go back to my script, we talked about numerous first workloads, most of which are mixed workload deployments. So, I think again, it’s a right of passage. There is a perception that the incumbents would actually build here and we just have to plough through this. 
Jason Ader
Thank you.
Operator 
The next question is from Wamsi Mohan from Bank of America Merrill Lynch.
Wamsi Mohan 
Yes, thank you. Dheeraj, on the sales force reorientation, how are you measuring the progress? And how has this reorientation change the sales cycle, size of the deals in the last quarter? How are you expecting this to evolve over the next few quarters? And I have a follow-up.
Dheeraj Pandey
Yes, so we made some really good progress in Q3. A lot of the heavy lifting of the design is behind us. We continued to hire into our Global accounts team and also doing some in-hiring in the moving sales team members as needed to have them focus on the large customers and large deals themselves. Duston actually reiterated a lot of those and I also talked about many of those. 
We are focused on three different productivities and we will go and look at the top of the pyramid, the middle of the pyramid, and the bottom of the pyramid, whether it’s global accounts and enterprise accounts and commercial accounts and how they are doing productivity-wise on a quarter-to-quarter basis. 
Wamsi Mohan 
Okay, thanks, Dheeraj. And Duston, your new customer adds at 790 was so pretty good, but was that the level you had expected to add or is the sales execution issue is impacting that number, could have been larger. It sounds like the pace of new adds and sales hires are at least slowing down intermittently. So, if you could provide some context there?
Duston Williams
Yes, no, Q3 is always – as you come off a strong Q2 usually and it did 900 plus new customers in Q2. So the 790 was a pretty good performance actually for Q3 there. We mentioned in the last quarter that we had slowed down headcount a little bit. We are starting to accelerate that again selectively and in the right areas and things like that, but that will continue to be fair amount of headcount adds as we go forward.
Operator 
The next question is from Simona Jankowski from Goldman Sachs.
Simona Jankowski 

Hi, thank you. Your revenue guidance was quite strong and it sounds like there is fixed income or software-only deals to manage the gross margin situation and I believe you’ll lose out something like 40% of the revenue when you take those deals, which implies that the underlying guidance is even stronger than it would appear. So I just wanted to find out what is driving that. And then, secondly, you talked about what the upside to gross margins would have been under the new accounting rule. Can you also quantify what the upside would have been to revenue? Thank you.
Duston Williams
Sure, let’s see, on the – your point on the top-line and the impact by getting to 57% - 58%, you noted in there, I said, if needed, we’d swap to some more software. So there is not a ton that we expect to have to do. 
Quite honestly we’ll see how the quarter progresses with big deals and bigger deals typically. For the most part have higher margins as these bigger customers understand the value of the full stack and what we are trying to do here. So, we will see how that progresses, but I wouldn’t read a ton into that that we are really damaging the top-line based on holding to the 58%. 
There may be some, but it’s probably not significant from that perspective. And then, pretty much on your other question, I just think it should be roughly a 1 to 1 ratio, I got to think through that again, revenue and gross profit there, because it’s all software. 
Simona Jankowski 
Sure, thank you.
Duston Williams
For the most part.
Dheeraj Pandey
And then the gross margin difference is something you already highlight, right?
Simona Jankowski 
Yes.
Duston Williams
Yes.
Operator 
The next question is from Alex Kurtz from Pacific Crest Securities.
Alex Kurtz 
Thanks guys. Just a question and a clarification. You guys have outlined getting to roughly a third of the business over the longer-term from software and inscription then I was just wondering if maybe you could give us an update on that, maybe some timing over the next couple of years when that would be reasonable given all these new OEMs that you are working with? And then, a clarification around the Cisco business, it sounds like, there is a little bit of momentum here and obviously they have global scale. So, maybe an update about where the Cisco relationship sits today and where you think it kind of play out over the next couple of quarters?
Dheeraj Pandey
Yes. Thanks, Alex. Yes, on the second question of Cisco, I think it’s still early days. We are basically acting like a start-up, because it’s a start-up idea and if you go back 10, 12 years, this is what virtualization is facing in terms of headwind because, now the server guys really wanted to bless virtualization and then obviously, the market force has actually convinced everybody that this is the right thing to do and in fact it didn’t reduce the server sales, it actually increased because people could do more in the same amount of time. 
So I think a very similar kind of headwind is upon us from companies like Cisco and HP. But we believe that the market forces will actually speak and we see some released strong momentum there from the market, from the customers who actually very much like Nutanix software running on their current Cisco hardware. 
So how things evolve in the coming years – coming couple of years and we cannot report every quarter, but on the long-term, one-third, one-third, one-third, we still believe that’s actually a very feasible and sustainable model for us. I think you have started seeing some ELAs. You have started seeing Lenovo actually made progress. 
These two are very early starters both Cisco and HP themselves. And finally, I think IBM could be dark horse, we just don’t know yet because we don’t fully understand the IBM ecosystem. So, if you put all this stuff together and then there is obviously software that we are selling at high levels to the stack, like Prism Pro, which is our operations management software, self-service portal and then the acquisition we made about almost a year ago of Calm.io, which is automation and orchestration.

All this stuff actually goes together to build our overall software portfolio. So we are quite hopeful that we will get to the number which is one-third of our overall business in pure software. 
Alex Kurtz 
All right, thanks.
Operator 
The next question is from Matt Hedberg from RBC Capital Markets.
Matthew Hedberg 
Hey guys, nice quarter. Dheeraj, tier-one workload seems particularly strong this quarter. Can you give us a sense for what some of those non-VDI workloads are? And may be what are that tier-one workload mix look like on a year-over-year basis?
Dheeraj Pandey
For the last question, I don’t have the data. We’ll probably have to check before we say anything about year-over-year. But I talked about Microsoft SQL server. It’s a pretty big chunk of our deployments of that and Oracle as you saw, quite a few of those, we have started to see a good bit of SAP and Splunk as well. So, I think on the whole, I think, pretty much anything that can be virtualized and has been virtualized in the past, we are seeing all those big virtual machines come on Nutanix and we also opened up this form-factor which is sort of a storage-only grid that can even work with physical applications that’s not been virtualized. The beauty of the software is that it doesn’t care if it’s hyperconverged or not. We can also cater to some of these physical applications and some of our customers that actually using that too. So I think all in all, we’ve been tracking to about – more than 50% of these tier-one workloads across Microsoft and Oracle and SAP and Splunk and VDI is about a quarter of our business now.
Matthew Hedberg 
That’s great. And then, maybe Duston, the color on the 200 to 300 basis point gross margin benefit had 606 been adopted was helpful, I am curious, if we look at that on an EBIT margin perspective, is it the roughly the same benefit? Or should it differ from that 200 to 300 BPS?
Duston Williams
It’s roughly, you’ve got commissions that would flow in there, I guess, but, beyond that, it’s pretty much the same. 
Matthew Hedberg 
Got it. Thanks guys.
Operator 
The next question is from Mark Murphy from JP Morgan
Mark Murphy 
Yes, thank you. And I’ll add my congrats. I joined a few minutes late. Please forgive me if you might have already covered this. But, Duston, so I wanted to ask you, just the very slight reduction in the bill-to-revenue ratio to 1.25, could you help us understand the underlying drivers of that? And also, is there some permanence attached to that as we roll forward and begin to think beyond the July quarter? That's my first question, and I do have a follow-up.
Duston Williams
Yes, so, on the ratio, mostly, that was – we always have some different mix in support and things like that those up and down. But mostly, that was because of the OEM piece. Again, a lot of that ended up in backlog, a good chunk of it, 20% of our backlog was Dell, Lenovo had a piece of backlog in there too. So again, that would have been billed and not recognized. So that would have pumped the ratio up a bit. 
Mark Murphy 
Okay. And then, as a follow-up, so you mentioned a measurable improvement in the number of large deals in the quarter, particularly in North America and I am trying to understand does that trend feel sustainable? In other words, do you think it happened - do you think it happened naturally or was it more of an effect of deals that slipped out of Q2 and closed in Q3? Or perhaps did you set any special incentives for sales teams to buckle down and focus on larger deals in the quarter?
Dheeraj Pandey
Yes, I think – I don’t think there was anything force there for Q3 itself. If you think about the architecture for a sales motion, realize that we actually do not start with these 18 month long sales cycles, because of the beauty of the product, it’s an elastic fabric, you can start at three nodes and the same system can go to 300 nodes over time. 

So we see a customer with a kind of put a foot in the door with a 100K system and then they buy another $0.5 million and $1 million and finally in a matter of 12 months, they might come back with a $5 million deal that didn’t take 18 months to close, which is what typically happens in the enterprise selling, that been anything that high value takes 12 to 18 months. 
And in our case, because we have actually broken the amount to smaller chunks, existing customers come back with larger deals, because the trust has actually built over time. And therefore some of these large deals don’t take as long as it does for the old legacy infrastructure. So I think we saw a lot of that happen this quarter. The existing customers came back with large deals and it just happened to be fortuitous for us.
Mark Murphy 
Great, and then, Dheeraj, one last quick one. Just given Microsoft's increasing emphasis as they are talking about the merits of this intelligent edge concept and forcing a huge audience really to think more about hybrid architectures, is there any noticeable movement back toward private cloud or hybrid cloud that you can notice, whether it's relating to that or elsewhere? And just have you seen any incremental signs of customers moving some of the steady-state expensive types of workloads off of Amazon AWS and onto Nutanix?
Dheeraj Pandey
Yes, I think we’ve seen quite a few and especially if these apps were not written with scale out sort of architecture in mind, when we needed single large BM to perform really well or needed predictability and things like that. So, we have in fact, I talked about one of them in my script as well, a very large ecommerce player in Asia-Pacific that brought all of it back because of not just performance reasons, but also cost reasons. 
I mean, at the end of the day, they went there because it was easy to use but finally when they found something which is just it is on prem, they could just do it with very few people, because one of the big costs of on prem infrastructure is people cost. 
And when we take that away and bring it, make it to be as elegant, then people start to compare the economics and we’ve actually seen the economics to be quite different and we have started to show that in the lot of TCO analysis to customers that renting a hotel with predictable workloads could be quite expensive when you leave or hang for the optionality of pulling the plug by the hour, which is what public cloud charges you buy in many cases actually. 
Mark Murphy 
Thank you.
Operator 
The next question is from Katy Huberty from Morgan Stanley.
Katy Huberty 
Thank you. Good afternoon. What percentage of your customers are paying for premium software today? And should we expect that portfolio of offerings to expand over the next year and the penetration of customers or billings to increase?
Dheeraj Pandey
Katy, if you look at the number of customers, obviously, there is a healthy mix of OEMs there as well which is something that you probably saw in Q2 as well this – there are quite a few smaller retail customers who basically essentially become software-only customers for us because of our OEM partners selling them their appliances. 
But the ones that we are doing direct are mostly very large customers and I think getting to software-only deals with them takes a little bit of time, because we need to first gain trust that this is a needed platform they want to rollout for everything. And we’ve started to see some early signs in the last six months, I would say, when some of the very large customers are now saying, let’s see if you can actually do ELAs with the Nutanix operating system.
Katy Huberty 
But should we expect that portfolio of value-added services, analytics and security to increase and more opportunity for selling premium software into the installed base?

Dheeraj Pandey
That is our hope actually, in fact, there is reason why we have such an effort going on and really looking at micro segmentation and network overlays and a lot of things around orchestration and automation is because we want to go and sell those things as a full-blown, full stack operating system.
Katy Huberty 
Right. And then, as it relates to the Cisco and HPE business, without a full-blown OEM relationship, should we think about selling into that hardware as a single-digit percentage of the business or is it possible that the channel could help you take that to a more meaningful level?
Dheeraj Pandey
If you were to ask me as a CEO, I would say it’s – we should expect the conservative and then, I think there is definitely something you said about the channel, because obviously there is multiple places that our software can meet the hardware, the one on the left of the spectrum is where it meets in our factory, the middle one is where it meets in an OEM factory, but we can also meet at the channel which is a very interesting thing that we have been thinking about, especially because the channel also wants to make some money on this rather than just we sharing our profits with the OEM partners.
Operator 
The next question is from Aaron Rakers from Stifel. 
Aaron Rakers 
Yes, thank you for taking the questions and congratulations on the quarter. Curious as you look at the IBM opportunity, how you are thinking about the ramp of that OEM partnership? Should we think about something similar to the Dell and now ramping Lenovo relationships? Or do you think that ramp could come on quicker?
Dheeraj Pandey
Thanks, Aaron. I think it’s early days, it’s early days, because we have some early inkling of the product and the workloads, you are looking at, I mean, just trying to learn about the IBM ecosystem, the sales force. Obviously, there is a lot of excitement and the fact that they have IBM Global Technology Services, GTS could be a very new thing for us as well. 
Power has real high end customers and very high end applications, especially in the space of cognitive and big data applications. And I think what mix is interesting is, notably for the first time, a single control plane, a single data plane, single hypervisor run time can now span Intel x86 and Power microprocessor’s hardware. 
So I think that’s the beauty of what we are building, that we can actually merge these silos. We can be this silo busting software and no other hypervisor, no other operating system has actually gone across these. So there is something there which makes Power no more just a silo. 
Aaron Rakers 
Okay. And then, with regard to the Cisco relationship, I know, you mentioned it's early days, but as you garner more momentum, how do you see Cisco reacting, given obviously they have their HyperFlex product? I am curious, as you see that business grow, is there the propensity for Cisco to become a more formalized partner in your mind, if HyperFlex doesn't necessarily take off to the degree that they would like it to?
Dheeraj Pandey
Yes, I think it’s a great question. Obviously it’s perilous to predict in these situations. But one thing I’ve learned about the art of negotiation, Aaron, is that, what’s non-negotiable today, you have to figure out how to build the process so that becomes negotiable tomorrow. 
And that’s the process they’ve been playing out with for the last nine months there hoping to actually have this process play out where Cisco understands what HyperFlex is and Cisco also understands the value that we can bring to their rack bound servers, because, as you can see from their predictions and everything else that the blade business is actually weakening and kind of fading away in this new environment which is more web-scale and cloud-like and rack mounts are a very different gross margin profile. So I think there is something there between us. But, we continue to work in this art of negotiation where what was non-negotiable yesterday could probably become negotiable tomorrow.

Operator 
The next question is from Jayson Noland from Robert Baird. 
Jayson Noland 
Okay, great. Thank you. Dheeraj, I wanted to ask on Lenovo. You mentioned a sharp increase there and any color you can add and if you could frame the potential for Lenovo relative to Dell? And then, Duston, I wanted to ask on OpEx. I think you said an incremental $10 million for the next couple, three quarters. I know you've got the conference in FQ4, but how should we think about that for our models? Thanks.
Dheeraj Pandey
I think on the first question, we did a really good business within this quarter. Our joint largest deal to-date with them was this quarter. And they are doing well with us in the large enterprise, verticals such as high-end financials, heavy industry, retail, sled, healthcare and technology, I think, these are all very important verticals as we actually start to learn more about the partnership itself. 
So I would say that, there is a lot of transformation that Lenovo itself is going through as a company. They just split their PCG and DCG division. So there is a lot of go to market stuff that we are co-designing and building together. But the early signs look good and the fact Global 2000 is actually very much friendly towards Lenovo is actually a great sign for us. And for Duston, there was a question for you as well.
Duston Williams
I am sorry, Jason. Consolidating expenses, yes, I think, we’ve got a couple things. Obviously, we have our customer’s .NEXT conference coming up shortly at the end of June. We look at that obviously, ultimately as demand generation and then in Q1, we’ve got a lot of stuff going on. We’ve got our worldwide sales teams with sales enablement that takes place in Q1 to continue to train the sales teams on new offerings and value selling and things like that. 
So, along with headcount increases and other things as we go forward there, I think, we are going through the Q1 expenses now, but, it has a chance of being – I said at a minimum of ten, it has a chance probably a little higher than 10 maybe sequentially in Q1. But once we get stabilized on the growth, I think the big deals, as long as big deals continue to be reasonably healthy, that takes care of a lot of issues. 
Jayson Noland 
Okay. Thanks, guys.
Operator 
The last question at this time is from Andrew Nowinski from Piper Jaffray.
Andrew Nowinski 
Hi, thanks for squeezing me in. Just a question on AHV, I think you had in one of your slides; it was about 23% of nodes. I guess, just maybe just two questions along those lines. Are you charging for that? And if so, what percentage of bookings is AHV right now?
Dheeraj Pandey
Yes, just like the public cloud, Andrew, we are not really charging for the hypervisor. It’s part of the overall value selling. But we go and charge for the operations management software. We have this control playing software which we call Prism Central, which comes in the form of Prism Pro. I think those are the kind of things we charge for but not the hypervisor runtime itself. 
Some of the features of the runtime, like for example, network security, and things like that, like we announced micro segmentation and so on, they will be part of the pro in ultimate editions. If you recall, we have the good, the better, the best versions of our software. The good goes with the life of the hardware, but the better and best are term licenses that we actually sell for. So some of these capabilities which are advanced capabilities go with pro or ultimate.
Duston Williams
And just, Andrew, on that 23%, so we calculate that on a percent of total nodes, but as you might expect that was tilted to a lower percentage of AHV. So, if you look at it on just NX nodes, it’s actually quite a bit stronger than that.
Andrew Nowinski 

Okay. And then, are you seeing clusters that deploy AHV, are they actually ripping out their current hypervisor vendor and realizing some of the savings that you had talked about during your IPO roadshow that customers can achieve by using AHV?
Dheeraj Pandey
Well, by definition, if they are using AHV on our nodes, they are not using any other hypervisor and if they have other brown field deployments where they are using the other hypervisors and you probably don’t keep account on those things. But we know that, we can definitely keep track of our own and now we are finally getting into some ELA discussions where some of our very large customers with the last two three years are saying they really want to go all in an AHV, which is when you will start to see some zero-sum game.
Andrew Nowinski 
Got it. Thanks, guys. 
Dheeraj Pandey
Okay.
Operator 
I will now turn the call back over to the presenters.
Well, thanks everyone for joining us today. Appreciate all your questions. As I mentioned before, the most important thing for us this quarter is our Annual .NEXT Conference beginning on June 28th in Washington D.C. And we look forward to seeing many of you there. Thank you.
Operator 
This concludes today’s conference call. You may now disconnect.
Copyright policy: All transcripts on this site are the copyright of Seeking Alpha. However, we view them as an important resource for bloggers and journalists, and are excited to contribute to the democratization of financial information on the Internet. (Until now investors have had to pay thousands of dollars in subscription fees for transcripts.) So our reproduction policy is as follows: You may quote up to 400 words of any transcript on the condition that you attribute the transcript to Seeking Alpha and either link to the original transcript or to www.SeekingAlpha.com. All other use is prohibited.
THE INFORMATION CONTAINED HERE IS A TEXTUAL REPRESENTATION OF THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S CONFERENCE CALL, CONFERENCE PRESENTATION OR OTHER AUDIO PRESENTATION, AND WHILE EFFORTS ARE MADE TO PROVIDE AN ACCURATE TRANSCRIPTION, THERE MAY BE MATERIAL ERRORS, OMISSIONS, OR INACCURACIES IN THE REPORTING OF THE SUBSTANCE OF THE AUDIO PRESENTATIONS. IN NO WAY DOES SEEKING ALPHA ASSUME ANY RESPONSIBILITY FOR ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS MADE BASED UPON THE INFORMATION PROVIDED ON THIS WEB SITE OR IN ANY TRANSCRIPT. USERS ARE ADVISED TO REVIEW THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S AUDIO PRESENTATION ITSELF AND THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S SEC FILINGS BEFORE MAKING ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS.
If you have any additional questions about our online transcripts, please contact us at: transcripts@seekingalpha.com. Thank you!
About this article:ExpandTagged: Technology, Information & Delivery Services, TranscriptsError in this transcript? Let us know.Contact us to add your company to our coverage or use transcripts in your business.Learn more about Seeking Alpha transcripts here.Follow SA Transcripts and get email alertsSearch TranscriptThis transcriptFindAll transcriptsFindCompare To:All NTNX TranscriptsOther Companies in this sector





Technology Stocks | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Technology StocksA Bear's Trade On Cisco For 5.6% IncomeCSCO• Yesterday, 9:00 PM • Eric Basmajian•10 CommentsRogers Communications - The Telecom Riding The Market Like There Is No TomorrowRCI• Yesterday, 8:18 PM • The Dividend Guy•1 CommentFlex Ltd.. 2018 Q1 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesFLEX• Yesterday, 8:01 PM • SA Transcripts•1 CommentThe Sage Group To Acquire Intacct For Financial Management SolutionsSGGEF• Yesterday, 7:46 PM • Donovan JonesGigamon, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesGIMO• Yesterday, 7:42 PM • SA TranscriptsAMD: The Price Is Still SillyAMD• Yesterday, 7:24 PM • Michael Wiggins De Oliveira•83 CommentsAmazon: Ugly Q3 Guidance Easily PredictedAMZN• Yesterday, 7:18 PM • Stone Fox Capital•57 CommentsInphi: Accelerating In The High-Speed LaneIPHI• Yesterday, 7:10 PM • Atanas Baldzhiyski•1 CommentNational Instruments Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesNATI• Yesterday, 7:08 PM • SA TranscriptsIBM Will Fail Where Microsoft ThrivesMSFT, IBM• Yesterday, 6:37 PM • The Dividend Guy•14 CommentsForecasting Apple's Q3 Using Apple GuidanceAAPL• Yesterday, 6:37 PM • Scott Nickerson•8 CommentsThis Is Not Your Grandfather's AT&TEditors' Pick • T• Yesterday, 6:23 PM • Chuck Carnevale•40 CommentsAmazon: First Look And AWS ThoughtsAMZN• Yesterday, 6:21 PM • D.M. Martins Research•35 CommentsVeon: Launching A New ProductVEON• Yesterday, 5:22 PM • KMP IdeasA10 Networks, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesATEN• Yesterday, 4:58 PM • SA TranscriptsAT&T Remains Strong For Income InvestorsT• Yesterday, 4:58 PM • Aisha Rahman•18 Comments8X8 Inc 2018 Q1 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesEGHT• Yesterday, 4:50 PM • SA TranscriptsXiaomi Comeback Marches On, But Will It Last?XI• Yesterday, 4:24 PM • Doug YoungLooking Deeper Into AMD's EarningsAMD• Yesterday, 4:22 PM • Technology Investing•83 CommentsApple A Buy For The Total Return InvestorAAPL• Yesterday, 4:13 PM • William Stamm•4 CommentsAT&T And Time Warner:  Strong AT&T Earnings Enhance The Case For The Combined EntityT• Yesterday, 3:22 PM • Comanche Peak Investments•13 CommentsIchor Systems: An Unknown GemICHR• Yesterday, 3:16 PM • Jeremy Rowe•8 CommentsMicrosoft Riding High On The CloudMSFT• Yesterday, 3:13 PM • Sramana Mitra•4 CommentsFacebook Joins The Half A Trillion ClubFB• Yesterday, 3:01 PM • Bespoke Investment Group•15 CommentsApple: Analysis Of Its New Long-Term DebtAAPL• Yesterday, 2:33 PM • Samuel Eneh•6 CommentsTexas Instruments: The Auto Segment Is StrongTXN• Yesterday, 2:30 PM • Roman Luzgin•5 CommentsIntel Earnings Preview: Q2 Results Come Out After Market CloseINTC• Yesterday, 2:09 PM • JJ Kinahan•4 CommentsActivision Earnings PredictionATVI• Yesterday, 2:08 PM • Earnings Forecast Focus•10 CommentsFacebook - Very Strong Quarter For This GARP PlayFB• Yesterday, 2:08 PM • The Value Investor•5 CommentsWhy Imagination Technologies Might Be A Perfect Acquisition For NvidiaNVDA• Yesterday, 2:00 PM • Motek Moyen•36 CommentsIs Twitter Suffering From A Trump Hangover: Have Mass Boycotts Begun?TWTR• Yesterday, 1:54 PM • Paul Franke•19 CommentsTwitter: Lacking The Network Effect The Market WantsTWTR• Yesterday, 1:11 PM • Stone Fox Capital•15 CommentsAMD Earnings TakeawaysAMD• Yesterday, 1:06 PM • Earnings Forecast Focus•42 CommentsActivist Investor Is Catalyst To Unlock Significant Value At Edgewater TechnologyEditors' Pick • EDGW• Yesterday, 1:05 PM • Jim RoumellLiquidity Services Is Out Of Favor, Overlooked, Misunderstood And UndervaluedEditors' Pick • LQDT• Yesterday, 12:55 PM • Jim Roumell•2 CommentsE-Commerce Giant Amazon Reports Q2 Earnings Today After Market CloseAMZN• Yesterday, 12:50 PM • JJ Kinahan•20 CommentsGoogle Home Has Competitive Strengths In Fast Growing Smart Speaker MarketGOOG, GOOGL• Yesterday, 12:50 PM • LD Investments•11 CommentsTwitter: Testing Investors' PatienceTWTR• Yesterday, 12:43 PM • D.M. Martins Research•8 CommentsTwitter Q2 Earnings: The Ship Is GroundedTWTR• Yesterday, 12:21 PM • Amigobulls•5 CommentsMomo: An Investment To Consider?MOMO• Yesterday, 12:11 PM • William Pruzinsky•4 CommentsArtificial Intelligence: Apple's Second Revolutionary OfferingAAPL• Yesterday, 11:58 AM • J. M. Manness•24 CommentsIs It Too Late To Buy Facebook?FB• Yesterday, 11:57 AM • Andres Cardenal, CFA•39 CommentsEntegris, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesENTG• Yesterday, 11:36 AM • SA TranscriptsAMD: We Have Lift OffAMD• Yesterday, 11:27 AM • Kumquat Research•76 CommentsAMD: The Inside StoryAMD• Yesterday, 11:16 AM • The Structure Of Price•50 CommentsNokia Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesNOK• Yesterday, 10:41 AM • SA Transcripts•4 CommentsApple: On A Slippery SlopeAAPL• Yesterday, 10:38 AM • Rohit Chhatwal•47 CommentsVerizon Follows Suit, Delivers A Strong QuarterVZ• Yesterday, 10:01 AM • D.M. Martins Research•17 CommentsMicrosoft Versus IBM - Which Moat To Invest In?IBM, MSFT• Yesterday, 9:51 AM • Houman Tamaddon•51 CommentsAmerican Tower Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesAMT• Yesterday, 9:50 AM • SA TranscriptsAutomatic Data Processing, Inc. 2017 Q4 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesADP• Yesterday, 9:49 AM • SA TranscriptsTwitter: This Is RidiculousTWTR• Yesterday, 9:38 AM • Celeritas Investments•69 CommentsApple: DCF ValuationAAPL• Yesterday, 9:14 AM • Oleh Kombaiev•24 CommentsI'm Afraid IBM Can't Make It This TimeIBM• Yesterday, 9:12 AM • The Dividend Guy•16 CommentsVipshop Holdings Is Fairly PricedVIPS• Yesterday, 9:11 AM • Sven Carlin•1 CommentAnalog Devices Has High Margin Of SafetyADI• Yesterday, 8:57 AM • Kush Patel•1 CommentRedfin Ignores The ElephantsRDFN• Yesterday, 8:35 AM • IPO Candy•3 CommentsNokia: A Solid 'Hold' After EarningsNOK• Yesterday, 8:14 AM • Orthodox Investor•18 CommentsIBM: The Incredible Shrinking IT VendorIBM• Yesterday, 7:59 AM • Bert Hochfeld•36 CommentsHow Intel Is Becoming A Diversified AI PlayerINTC• Yesterday, 6:34 AM • Right Angle•10 CommentsIntel: Pre-Earnings Analysis And DCF RevisionINTC• Yesterday, 6:00 AM • Tobias BeithRenishaw Plc 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesRNSHF• Yesterday, 5:35 AM • SA TranscriptsNvidia Finally Ships VoltaNVDA• Yesterday, 3:12 AM • Mark Hibben•18 CommentsFacebook Q2: Why Is The Stock So Cheap?FB• Yesterday, 2:39 AM • SIC Investment Research Inc.•65 CommentsPayPal's Q2: Consistent Growth Again, But What About That 8% Tax Rate?PYPL• Yesterday, 1:57 AM • Greg Wajda•9 CommentsSK Telecom Co., Ltd. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesSKM• Yesterday, 12:26 AM • SA TranscriptsAlphabet's Q2: Of Cash Flow And YouTubeGOOG, GOOGL• Wed, Jul. 26, 10:46 PM • Steven Mallas•9 CommentsTelefonica Brasil, S.A 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesVIV• Wed, Jul. 26, 10:19 PM • SA TranscriptsAnalog Devices: Winning Or Losing On Apple's Next iPhoneADI• Wed, Jul. 26, 10:12 PM • Prescient Investment AnalysisQualcomm And Cisco Make Early Investments In AgTechCSCO, QCOM• Wed, Jul. 26, 10:12 PM • Donovan Jones•12 Comments4 Companies Which Stand To Benefit From 3D SensingFNSR, LITE, VIAV• Wed, Jul. 26, 9:46 PM • Shareholders Unite•30 CommentsAlphabet: This Stock Will Help You Reach Your Retirement GoalsGOOG, GOOGL• Wed, Jul. 26, 9:27 PM • Michael Wiggins De Oliveira•17 CommentsCan MassRoots Remain A Going Concern?MSRT• Wed, Jul. 26, 8:26 PM • Harlem and Stone•8 CommentsTwitter: How Sustainable Is The Resurgence?TWTR• Wed, Jul. 26, 8:02 PM • Kayode Omotosho•7 CommentsASM International N.V. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesASMIY• Wed, Jul. 26, 7:53 PM • SA Transcripts123456...1163Next Page





Earnings Call Transcripts | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO» 








Earnings Transcripts


  Sectors 


All
Most Popular

Basic Materials
Conglomerates
Consumer Goods
Financial
Healthcare
Industrial Goods
Services
Technology
Utilities










World Wrestling Entertainment's (WWE) CEO Vince McMahon on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


WWE•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  1:01 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




HFF's (HF) CEO Mark Gibson on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


HF•
      Fri, Jul. 28, 12:47 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Cypress Semiconductor (CY) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CY•
      Fri, Jul. 28, 12:33 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Align Technology (ALGN) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ALGN•
      Fri, Jul. 28, 12:09 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Edison International (EIX) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


EIX•
      Fri, Jul. 28, 12:07 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




First Solar (FSLR) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


FSLR•
      Fri, Jul. 28, 12:07 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Southwest Airlines (LUV) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


LUV•
      Fri, Jul. 28, 12:07 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




BofI Holding's (BOFI) CEO Greg Garrabrants on Q4 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


BOFI•
      Fri, Jul. 28, 12:03 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Ellie Mae (ELLI) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ELLI•
      Thu, Jul. 27, 11:51 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




MicroStrategy Incorporated's (MSTR) CEO Michael Saylor on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MSTR•
      Thu, Jul. 27, 11:43 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Vale's (VALE) CEO Murilo Ferreira on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


VALE•
      Thu, Jul. 27, 11:43 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Digital Realty Trust (DLR) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


DLR•
      Thu, Jul. 27, 11:43 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




BJ's Restaurants (BJRI) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


BJRI•
      Thu, Jul. 27, 11:39 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Republic Services (RSG) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


RSG•
      Thu, Jul. 27, 11:37 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Cloud Peak Energy's (CLD) CEO Colin Marshall on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CLD•
      Thu, Jul. 27, 11:34 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Cerner (CERN) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CERN•
      Thu, Jul. 27, 11:27 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Proofpoint (PFPT) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


PFPT•
      Thu, Jul. 27, 11:27 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




OceanaGold Corp's (OCANF) CEO Michael Wilkes on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


OCANF•
      Thu, Jul. 27, 11:25 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Ultragenyx Pharmaceutical's (RARE) CEO Emil Kakkis on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


RARE•
      Thu, Jul. 27, 11:24 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Floor & Decor's (FND) CEO Tom Taylor on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


FND•
      Thu, Jul. 27, 11:22 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




SVB Financial's (SIVB) CEO Greg Becker on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


SIVB•
      Thu, Jul. 27, 11:20 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Western Digital (WDC) Q4 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


WDC•
      Thu, Jul. 27, 11:17 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




California Water Service's (CWT) CEO Martin Kropelnicki on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CWT•
      Thu, Jul. 27, 11:15 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Enova International's (ENVA) CEO David Fisher on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ENVA•
      Thu, Jul. 27, 11:13 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Tandem Diabetes Care's (TNDM) CEO Kim Blickenstaff on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


TNDM•
      Thu, Jul. 27, 11:09 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Dynamic Materials' (BOOM) CEO Kevin Longe on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


BOOM•
      Thu, Jul. 27, 11:07 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




A10 Networks' (ATEN) CEO Lee Chen on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ATEN•
      Thu, Jul. 27, 11:00 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Digi International's (DGII) CEO Ron Konezny on Q3 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


DGII•
      Thu, Jul. 27, 10:52 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




8X8's (EGHT) CEO Vik Verma on Q1 2018 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


EGHT•
      Thu, Jul. 27, 10:49 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Boston Beer (SAM) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


SAM•
      Thu, Jul. 27, 10:43 PM

        •
SA Transcripts





123456...4451Next Page





Search Transcripts






You can use: AND,NOT, OR,* *(exact phrase)













 




















Team | ThoughtSpot



















ProductOverview
Technology
Embedded Analytics
Pricing

SolutionsOverview
Retail
Financial Services
Manufacturing
Communications
Healthcare

Customers
ResourcesOverview
Analyst Reports
White Papers
Webinars
Case Studies
Datasheets
Demo Videos
Community

BlogsOverview
The Data Chief
Fact & Dimension
Company Blog
CodeX

About UsTeam
Careers
Partners
News
Events

Request Demo
 






Get to know the ThoughtSpot Team

Meet The Team






Who we are
MISSION
Our mission is to enable analytics at "human scale" and put search-driven analytics in the hands of 20M users by 2020. It's an ambitious goal, but we love solving hard problems with humility and empathy.
CULTURE
We describe our culture in two simple words: Selfless Excellence. We put the company and team ahead of oneself as we aim to be world class in everything we do (or we don’t do it at all). 











ThoughtSpot
Leadership Team





Ajeet Singh
Co-founder and CEO, ThoughtSpot
Read Bio






Ajeet Singh
Co-founder and CEO, ThoughtSpot




Ajeet Singh is Co-founder and CEO at ThoughtSpot. Driven by his passion for creating impactful businesses, Ajeet has had the experience of creating billion-dollar technology companies from scratch. Prior to starting ThoughtSpot, he was Co-founder and Chief Products Officer at Nutanix, a company that is revolutionizing the enterprise cloud industry and was the biggest tech IPO of 2016 ($4B). 
Prior to Nutanix, Ajeet learned the ropes of enterprise technology startups at Aster Data (acquired by Teradata for $300M), where he was Senior Director of Product Management. Prior to Aster Data, he worked at Oracle where he was part of the team that first launched Oracle Database to the Amazon EC2 cloud. Ajeet holds an MBA from the Indian Institute of Management, Calcutta and a Bachelor of Science in Chemical Engineering from the Indian Institute of Technology, Kanpur, where he graduated at the top of his class.
 








Amit Prakash
Co-founder and CTO
Read Bio






Amit Prakash
Co-founder and CTO










Amit is Co-founder and CTO at ThoughtSpot and has deep experience in building large scale analytics systems. Prior to ThoughtSpot, Amit led multiple analytics engineering teams in the Google AdSense businesses, contributing $50M+ quarter-on-quarter growth to the business through improving analytical algorithms for AdSense. Prior to that, Amit was a founding engineering in the Bing team at Microsoft, where he implemented the pagerank algorithms for search from scratch. Amit received his PhD in Computer Engineering from the University of Texas at Austin and a Bachelor of Technology in Electrical Engineering from the Indian Institute of Technology, Kanpur.
 








Brian Blond
Chief Revenue Officer
Read Bio






Brian Blond
Chief Revenue Officer




Brian is the Chief Revenue Officer (CRO) at ThoughtSpot. He has more than 15 years of experience in strategic business development and sales, helping lead rapid global growth at numerous enterprise software organizations. Brian previously served as CRO at Tealium and Vitrue. Prior to that, Brian held executive-level sales positions at Moxie Software and BladeLogic, where his efforts contributed to the company's IPO in 2007. 
Brian holds a B.A. from the University of Missouri, Columbia.
 








Scott Holden
Chief Marketing Officer
Read Bio






Scott Holden
Chief Marketing Officer




Scott Holden is the CMO at ThoughtSpot where he is responsible for product marketing, demand generation, content marketing, PR, AR, and events. Prior to ThoughtSpot, Scott spent seven years at Salesforce running a number of marketing teams, including leading marketing for the Salesforce1 Platform, Sales Cloud, Chatter, Industry Marketing, Customer Marketing, and SMB Marketing.
Previously, Scott ran the Transportation & Logistics team at Walmart.com. He began his career at JPMorgan as an M&A investment banker, covering Technology and Healthcare companies.
Scott has an MBA from Stanford University and a BA from Colgate University in economics and philosophy.
 








Tom Weeks
Chief Customer Officer
Read Bio






Tom Weeks
Chief Customer Officer







Tom leads Customer Success at ThoughtSpot where he is focused on helping customers achieve the analytics goals they never thought were possible with traditional BI solutions. Prior to ThoughtSpot, Tom led Customer Success and Digital Strategy at Apigee, where he helped large global enterprises transform both organizationally and technically in order to deliver innovative digital products and experiences to their customers.
Prior to Apigee, Tom has held various sales, marketing, and customer success roles including 6 years at Business Objects, where he built their global BI strategy and implementation business to over $250 million in revenue prior to being acquired by SAP.
Tom has an MBA, MIM, and BA from Washington University in St. Louis.
 
















Chris Brozek
VP Operations
Read Bio






Chris Brozek
VP Operations




Chris is an experienced executive business and technical leader with a history of scaling global operations, developing strong teams, building collaborative relationships and delivering business results. Over the past decade, Chris has lead operations teams at several technology companies, including Cisco, Omneon, Arch Rock, Violin Memory, and Picarro. Prior to joining ThoughtSpot, he served as VP Operations at Violin Memory (NYSE:VMEM) where he scaled manufacturing, support, and IT as Violin grew from startup through IPO.
Prior to industry, Chris had a distinguished career in the U.S. Navy, serving as Submarine Officer where he qualified as a Nuclear Submarine Engineer.
Chris holds a Bachelor of Science degree in Mechanical Engineering from Santa Clara University.
 








Alonzo Canada
VP Experience
Read Bio






Alonzo Canada
VP Experience




Alonzo Canada is VP of Experience of ThoughtSpot and is responsible for product, design, brand and overall customer experience. Prior to ThoughtSpot, Alonzo was Head of Design at Interana, a big data analytics company born out of Facebook, where he defined the product strategy and designed and launched Interana’s product. Previously, Alonzo was a partner at Jump Associates, a strategy and innovation consulting firm. At Jump, he worked with executives at companies like Audi, Samsung, HP and Yahoo! to identify new market opportunities and design new products and services.
Alonzo brings deep expertise in user experience design, team leadership, design thinking, product strategy, rapid prototyping, spearheading the design process, and uncovering product opportunities using qualitative research and quantitative analysis. Alonzo has taught classes in Needfinding and Design Strategy and Leadership at Stanford University’s D.School.
Alonzo received holds an MFA in Design from Stanford University and BA in Humanities from Brigham Young University.
 








Cole Shiflett
Head of People Operations
Read Bio






Cole Shiflett
Head of People Operations




Cole is Head of People Operations at ThoughtSpot. Prior to ThoughtSpot, Cole was an Assistant Dean at Stanford University, managing the selection and placement of Stanford's 1500 student staff, running operational functions of the student-managed communities at Stanford and leading special projects for the Residential Education department during significant growth. In her nine years at Stanford, Cole recruited and onboarded professional staff, managed on-call crisis response, and led diversity + inclusion initiatives and strategic planning.
Cole has a BA from Yale University and an MBA from California College of the Arts.
 
















Abhishek Rai
Co-founder and Principal Engineer
Read Bio






Abhishek Rai
Co-founder and Principal Engineer










Abhishek is Co-founder and Principal Engineer at ThoughtSpot. Prior to ThoughtSpot, Abhishek led a Borg development team at Google that manages all resources in Google’s data centers. He also worked on a virtual machine file system at VMWare.
Abhishek has a Master of Science in Computer Science from the State University of New York at Stony Brook and a Bachelor of Technology in Computer Science and Engineering from the Indian Institute of Technology, Kharagpur.
 








Priyendra Deshwal
Co-founder and Principal Engineer
Read Bio






Priyendra Deshwal
Co-founder and Principal Engineer










Priyendra is Co-founder and Principal Engineer at ThoughtSpot. Prior to ThoughtSpot, Priyendra worked on scaling the performance of Google search index significantly, as well as on improving search ranking algorithms.
Priyendra has a Master of Science in Computer Science from Stanford University and a Bachelor of Technology in Computer Science from the Indian Institute of Technology, Kanpur.
 








Sanjay Agrawal
Co-founder and Principal Engineer
Read Bio






Sanjay Agrawal
Co-founder and Principal Engineer




Sanjay is Co-founder and Principal Engineer at ThoughtSpot. Prior to ThoughtSpot, at Google he worked on the low latency, high throughput ads database. Sanjay has worked on query optimization in the cloud and automatic SQL tuning for SQL server while at Microsoft.
Sanjay has a Master of Science in Computer Science from the University of Wisconsin, Madison and a Bachelor of Technology in Computer Science and Engineering from the Indian Institute of Technology, Kanpur.
 








Vijay Ganesan
Co-founder and Head of PM
Read Bio






Vijay Ganesan
Co-founder and Head of PM










Vijay is Co-founder and Head of Product Management at ThoughtSpot. Vijay has a strong application development background and brings his BI domain knowledge to the team. Prior to ThoughtSpot, Vijay was leading the BI-in-the-cloud effort at Oracle. In his prior life, Vijay has architected and developed business intelligence and analytics products at PeopleSoft and i2 Technologies.
Vijay has Master of Science degrees in Electrical Engineering and Operations Research from North Carolina State University and a Bachelor of Technology in Electrical Engineering from the Indian Institute of Technology, Madras.
 








Shashank Gupta
Co-founder and Advisor
Read Bio






Shashank Gupta
Co-founder and Advisor




Shashank is a Co-founder ofThoughtSpot. Shashank is a strong systems generalist who brings his technical expertise and fast-paced execution oriented engineering management skills to the team. Prior to ThoughtSpot, Shashank was in senior engineering roles at Amazon, Yahoo and Cisco where he worked on search, distributed systems and networking. Shashank was one of the early engineers at Andiamo, a company that redefined networking for enterprise storage and was acquired by Cisco for $750M.
Shashank has a MS in Computer Engineering from the University of Texas at Austin and a Bachelor of Technology in Computer Science from the Indian Institute of Technology, Delhi.
 

















ThoughtSpot
Board Members





Ajeet Singh
Co-founder and CEO, ThoughtSpot
Read Bio






Ajeet Singh
Co-founder and CEO, ThoughtSpot




Ajeet Singh is Co-founder and CEO at ThoughtSpot. Driven by his passion for creating impactful businesses, Ajeet has had the experience of creating billion-dollar technology companies from scratch. Prior to starting ThoughtSpot, he was Co-founder and Chief Products Officer at Nutanix, a company that is revolutionizing the enterprise cloud industry and was the biggest tech IPO of 2016 ($4B). 
Prior to Nutanix, Ajeet learned the ropes of enterprise technology startups at Aster Data (acquired by Teradata for $300M), where he was Senior Director of Product Management. Prior to Aster Data, he worked at Oracle where he was part of the team that first launched Oracle Database to the Amazon EC2 cloud. Ajeet holds an MBA from the Indian Institute of Management, Calcutta and a Bachelor of Science in Chemical Engineering from the Indian Institute of Technology, Kanpur, where he graduated at the top of his class.
 








Ravi Mhatre
Partner and Co-founder, Lightspeed Venture Partners
Read Bio






Ravi Mhatre
Partner and Co-founder, Lightspeed Venture Partners




Ravi Mhatre is a founder of Lightspeed and focuses primarily on software infrastructure, applications and Internet investments. He has fifteen years of venture capital experience and six years of operating experience. Before joining Lightspeed, he was with Bessemer Venture Partners and invested in NetGenesis Software (NTGX), Verio (VRIO), VIA-Networks (VNWI), Webspective Software (acquired by Inktomi) and InCert Software (acquired by Geodesic). Before entering the venture capital industry, he was with Silicon Graphics, where he was a product manager and later directed the company’s workstation market development efforts. 
Previously, Ravi spent time in Lehman Brothers’ technology investment banking group and in management consulting with Booz Allen Hamilton. Ravi began his career as a software engineer at BDIS, a Silicon Valley-based analytical instrument manufacturer. He has served on the Board of Directors for The Indus Entrepreneurs Group (TiE) in Silicon Valley, has been recognized as a Top 100 dealmaker on Forbes’ Annual VC Midas List and has served as a judge for the prestigious Ernst & Young Entrepreneur of the Year Competition. Ravi holds a Bachelor of Science in Electrical Engineering, a Bachelor of Arts in Economics, and an MBA from Stanford University.
 








Arif Janmohamed
Partner, Lightspeed Venture Partners
Read Bio






Arif Janmohamed
Partner, Lightspeed Venture Partners




Arif Janmohamed joined Lightspeed in 2008 and focuses primarily on investments in the areas of cloud and datacenter technologies, as well as enterprise mobile and SaaS solutions. Prior to joining Lightspeed, he worked in the Corporate Business Development group at Cisco Systems. Before joining Cisco, he was with Novitas Capital, an early-stage venture capital firm. Earlier in his career, he worked in technical development and product management roles at WebTV, Andes Networks, and Sun Microsystems. Arif holds an MBA from the Wharton School, University of Pennsylvania and a BSc in Computer Engineering from the University of Waterloo, Canada.
 








Keith Rabois
Partner, Khosla Ventures
Read Bio






Keith Rabois
Partner, Khosla Ventures




Keith is an investment partner at Khosla Ventures. His focus includes consumer Internet, education, enterprise, financial services and digital health. Since joining KV, he’s led investments in Stripe, Timeful, HealthTap and Piazza, among many others. He also started real estate startup, OpenDoor, which aims to transform the process of selling a home through technology. Keith has a unique and unparalleled track record as an entrepreneur, executive and investor. Over the last decade, he has forged several of the most important new social and commerce platforms. Keith began his career in the industry as a senior executive at PayPal and subsequently served in influential roles at LinkedIn and as chief operating officer of Square. 
As a board member, Keith guided Yelp and Xoom from inception to successful initial public offerings. Simultaneously, he also invested in other like-minded entrepreneurs with early stakes in YouTube, Yammer, Palantir, Lyft, AirBnB, Eventbrite and Quora. Earlier in his career, Keith was a litigator at the preeminent Wall Street law firm Sullivan and Cromwell, after clerking for the United States Court of Appeals for the fifth circuit. Keith holds a bachelor’s degree in political science from Stanford University and a juris doctor degree with honors from Harvard University.
 








Hemant Taneja
Managing Director, General Catalyst
Read Bio






Hemant Taneja
Managing Director, General Catalyst




Hemant Taneja is a managing director of General Catalyst, a venture capital firm with approximately $3.75 billion under management. He launched the Palo Alto office the firm in 2011. Hemant focuses on founders with an authentic mission to change entire industries. His investment thesis, known as “economies of unscale,” describes how small, tightly focused companies leverage data and services to successfully take on much larger competitors. Taneja’s current investment portfolio ranges across the fields of energy, education, media, medicine, and finance, and includes companies such as Stripe, Snapchat, Gusto, Livongo Health, TuneIn, ClassDojo, Fundbox, Digit, Fractyl, Gridco Systems, and Highfive.
Taneja is also deeply interested in the intersection of technology and policy. He serves on the board of directors of Khan Academy and co-founded Advanced Energy Economy, a public policy advocacy group.
He holds five degrees from Massachusetts Institute of Technology.
 
















Investors









Lane Bess




Lane Bess
COO, ZScaler




Lane Bess serves as ZScaler's Chief Operating Officer. He has more than 30 years of security expertise as an operational executive, including global sales, marketing and leadership experience with NCR Corporation and AT&T. From 2008 to 2011,he served as President and CEO, Palo Alto Networks, a network security company, where he led its pre-IPO fundraising and grew its revenue run rate to more than $200M and cash flow positive. From 2002 to 2007, he served as EVP of Worldwide Sales and General Manager, Trend Micro, a global leader in Internet security, where he grew worldwide revenues to more than $1B. Lane has extensive experience in building technology businesses in the Europe, Asia Pacific and Japan as well as other International regions. He earned his MBA from the University of Dayton and his BS in Managerial Economics from Carnegie Mellon University.
 




Frank Slootman




Frank Slootman
President & CEO, ServiceNow




Frank Slootman serves as ServiceNow's President and Chief Executive Officer and as a director. Prior to this, Frank served as a partner with Greylock Partners from January 2011 to April 2011, and served as an advisor to EMC Corporation from January 2011 to February 2012. From July 2009 to January 2011, he served as President of the Backup Recovery Systems Division at EMC. From July 2003 to July 2009, he served as President and Chief Executive Officer of Data Domain, Inc., which was acquired by EMC in 2009.
Prior to joining Data Domain, Frank served as an executive at Borland Software Corporation from June 2000 to June 2003. From March 1993 to June 2000, he held consecutive general management positions for two enterprise software divisions of Compuware Corporation. Frank holds undergraduate and graduate degrees in economics from the Netherlands School of Economics, Erasmus University Rotterdam.
 




Steve Sommer




Steve Sommer
CMO, Splunk




Steve Sommer serves as the Chief Marketing Officer and Senior Vice President of Marketing at Splunk. Prior to Splunk, Steve served as Vice President, Marketing at WideOrbit Inc., a software company, from 2007 to 2008. From 2006 to 2007, he served as Vice President Global Marketing at SuccessFactors, Inc., a business execution software company. Previously, he held a variety of executive positions in fast-growing enterprise software companies including SVP Marketing at ArcSight, SVP Marketing & Business Development at Portal Software and VP Worldwide Marketing at Informix. Earlier in his career he worked as a strategy consultant at McKinsey & Company. Steve holds a B.S. from the Massachusetts Institute of Technology and an M.B.A. from Harvard Business School.
 




Sudheesh Nair




Sudheesh Nair
VP WW Sales & BD, Nutanix




Sudheesh Nair serves as the Vice President of Worldwide Sales and Business Development at Nutanix, the fastest growing enterprise startup of the past decade. He is building a world-class sales team that understands the challenges customers face with their virtualized datacenter infrastructure. He has a deep conviction that if you listen to the customer and the broader market, and focus your business priorities accordingly, everything else falls into place. He is passionate about turning conventional wisdom of enterprise sales upside down by hiring a diverse mix of sales people and technologists who value customer trust over everything else, use social media to nurture and evangelize, and have an unparalleled commitment for software tools to innovate in sales and demand generation.
Prior to joining Nutanix, Sudheesh built a strong foundation for a sales career, holding a variety of technical and sales leadership positions at IBM-XIV, DDN, ONStor and Zambeel.
 








Aaron Levie




Aaron Levie
Co-founder and CEO, Box




Aaron Levie is Co-founder and CEO of Box, which he launched in 2005 with co-founder and CFO Dylan Smith. Levie is the visionary behind Box's product and platform strategy, which is focused on incorporating the best of traditional content management with an easy to use user experience suited to the way people collaborate and work today. Levie leads the company in its mission to help businesses of all sizes be more productive, competitive and collaborative by connecting people and their most important information. Aaron studied at the Marshall School of Business at the University of Southern California before leaving to found Box.
 




Mark Leslie




Mark Leslie
Managing Director, Leslie Ventures




Mark Leslie is currently the managing director of Leslie Ventures, a private investment company. He is also a Lecturer in Management at Stanford Graduate School of Business where he teaches courses in Entrepreneurship, Ethics and Sales Organization.
Mark Leslie was the founding Chairman and CEO of Veritas Software. From 1980 until 1990 he served as president and chief executive officer of two Silicon Valley high- tech start up companies. Prior experience included sales management, sales executive, systems engineer, and software engineer. Mark Leslie designed and developed the first software hypervisor while employed at IBM in 1969. Mark currently serves on the boards of a number of privately held high-technology corporations, including Librato, Liquid Robotics, Model N Software, PureStorage, SeaMicro Systems, Skybox Imaging, Sugar CRM, Wall Street Systems and Xsigo Corporation. In addition he serves on the board of Overseers for the NYU Faculty of Arts and Sciences, as Chairman of the NYU Science Advisory Board, and as a member of the Executive Board of the NYU Innovation Fund.
Mark received a Bachelor of Arts degree in physics and mathematics from New York University in 1966 and completed Harvard Business School's program for management development in 1980.
 




Dheeraj Pandey




Dheeraj Pandey
Founder and CEO, Nutanix




Dheeraj is a co-founder and CEO of Nutanix. He has over 13 years of experience working at high growth enterprise software companies. Prior to founding Nutanix, Dheeraj was the VP of Engineering at Aster Data (now Teradata), where he helped build the product and its engineering team ground up. At Oracle, he managed the storage engine group for Oracle Database/Exadata, and co-authored numerous patents in the area of distributed databases. Dheeraj is a Ph.D. dropout from University of Texas (Austin), where he was a Graduate Fellow of CS. He has a BS in CS from the Indian Institute of Technology (IIT, Kanpur), where he was judged the Best All-Rounder Student Among All Graduating Students in All Disciplines.
 









Advisors



David Sangster




David Sangster
VP of Operations, Nutanix




David Sangster serves as the Vice President of Operations at Nutanix, where he brings more than 20 years of product development, manufacturing and operations experience. Most recently, he was at EMC, where he held the position of VP of Manufacturing Technology. Prior to EMC, he was VP of Operations at Data Domain (acquired by EMC in 2009) where he built out the manufacturing and supply chain capabilities to scale the company through a successful IPO in 2007. Previously, David held senior positions at Hewlett Packard and McDATA in a variety of engineering and manufacturing management positions. David holds a BS in Mechanical Engineering from MIT, a MS in Manufacturing Systems Engineering from Stanford University, and an MBA from Santa Clara University.
 




Brad Terrell




Brad Terrell
Ex-VP and GM, Netezza and Big Data Platforms, IBM




Brad Terrell most recently was VP and GM of Netezza and Big Data Platforms at IBM with global responsibility for sales, marketing, and product strategy. Prior to joining IBM through the Netezza acquisition, he launched and grew Netezza’s digital media business to over $100 million in annual revenue. Before joining Netezza, he developed and executed the verticalized go-to-market strategy that helped fuel Endeca’s rapid growth from $10M to over $100M in annual revenue. 
Prior to Endeca, Brad helped design and launch products including the Spyglass Mosaic web browser (which became Microsoft’s Internet Explorer), IBM PowerPC microprocessor, H&R Block online investing website, and FlightSafety Internationals FAA Level C-certified flight simulators. He co-founded and served as president of ElectricWish.com, ranked among the top 5 e-commerce sites on the web by ZDNet in 1999, and M-Nova, a pioneer in product development outsourcing to Eastern Europe. Brad earned his Bachelor of Arts in Computer Science from Rice University and his Master of Business Administration from the MIT Sloan School of Management.
 




Ash Kulkarni




Ash Kulkarni
SVP and GM, Data Integration and Data Quality, Informatica




Ashutosh “Ash” Kulkarni is senior vice president and general manager of Informatica’s Data Integration and Data Quality business units. Prior to Informatica, he spent many years at Sun Microsystems in various product management and development roles. He earned his Bachelor of Engineering from the University of Mumbai, his Master of Science from the University of Texas at Austin, and his Master of Business Administration from the University of California, Berkeley.
 




Bask Iyer




Bask Iyer
EVP & CIO, Dell




With more than 25 years of experience in both traditional Fortune 100 manufacturing companies and Silicon Valley-based high-tech firms, Bask now leads DELL/EMC and VMware’s global information and technology organization, managing critical technology applications and running the private and public clouds. Prior to joining Dell, he was and continues to serve as the CIO for VMware, He has also served as Group CIO at Honeywell and as CIO and Operations leader at Juniper Networks
 








Howard Ting




Howard Ting
SVP, Marketing & Product Management, Nutanix




Howard has 15 years of experience building and scaling enterprise software and infrastructure companies. At Nutanix, Howard is responsible for all aspects of marketing and product management, including global marketing strategy, product and solution marketing, corporate communications, demand generation, channel marketing, marketing operations, product strategy, product definition and lifecycle management, monetization strategy, technical enablement, and communities. 
Prior to Nutanix, Howard was Senior Director of Corporate Marketing at Palo Alto Networks, where he established and built the demand generation and marketing operations functions, which were significant contributors to the company’s growth, ultimately leading to a highly successful IPO in 2012. Before that, he was Senior Director of Product Management and Marketing at Securent, which was acquired by Cisco in 2009. Earlier in his career, Howard held product management and corporate development roles at RSA Security, Microsoft, and Identity Engines. Howard started his career in investment banking after receiving his B.S. degree from the University of California, Berkeley.
 




Irene Au




Irene Au
Ex-Head of User Experience, Google




Irene Au is an operating partner at Khosla Ventures, where she works with portfolio companies to make their design great. Irene has unprecedented experience building and leading User Experience teams, as she has led the entire UX team at Google (2006-2012), Yahoo! (1998-2006), and Udacity (2012-2014). She began her career as an interaction designer at Netscape Communications.
Irene also teaches yoga and meditation at Avalon Art and Yoga Center, one of Palo Alto’s oldest and most established yoga studios. She co-chairs the Board of Trustees at Bowman International School, a K-8 private Montessori school in Palo Alto.
Irene holds a bachelor’s of science in electrical and computer engineering from the University of South Carolina Honors College where she graduated summa cum laude and a master’s of science degree in industrial engineer and human-computer interaction from the University of Illinois, Urbana-Champaign.
 




Bipul Sinha




Bipul Sinha
Co-founder and CEO, Rubrik 




Bipul has over 18 years of experience in building billion-dollar products and companies from the ground up. Previously, he was a partner at Lightspeed, where he invested in Nutanix, PernixData, and Numerify. Before that, Bipul worked at Blumberg Capital where he was the founding investor and board member of Nutanix, a “multi-billion dollar unicorn” company that has revolutionized the enterprise data storage industry. Previously, Bipul was Director of Database Products at Oracle Corporation, where he led development of core data and transaction processing technologies. Bipul also held sales and engineering positions at American Megatrends and IBM.
Bipul received a Bachelor of Technology (Honors) in Electrical Engineering from Indian Institute of Technology, Kharagpur and an MBA from The Wharton School where he was a Palmer Scholar. Bipul also holds several patents in distributed computing.
 




Ken Rudin




Ken Rudin
Head of Analytics, Facebook




Ken Rudin leads Analytics at Facebook, where he's focused on leveraging Facebook's massive analytics platform to generate high-impact insights that optimize both the Facebook user experience and Facebook's overall business. Prior to Facebook, he was the VP of Analytics and Platform Technologies at Zynga.  Before that, he was the founder and CEO of LucidEra, a company that pioneered the creation of the on-demand analytics market. Before founding LucidEra, he was VP and General Manager of Siebel CRM OnDemand and also VP of Marketing for Siebel Analytics (now Oracle Analytics) at Siebel Systems.
Before Siebel, Ken served as Senior VP of Products at Salesforce.com, and prior to that was co-founder and CEO of Emergent Corporation, a consulting company focused on building large-scale data warehousing solutions for Fortune 500 companies.  Ken started his career at the Scalable Systems Division at Oracle, where he focused on large scale data warehouses. Ken holds a bachelors degree in computer science and electrical engineering from Harvard University and a masters degree in business from Stanford University.
 












Where we are

Join The Team

 

  





Forbes WelcomeCLOSE   More Options   Quote of the Day  Develop a curiosity overload. Kevin Harrington, Entrepreneur    


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft






















Loading Your Search Results - PeopleLooker.com























Updating Data On {{nameize fn}}{{#if mi}} {{nameize mi}}{{/if}} {{nameize ln}} {{#validLocation city}}in {{city}}{{#validLocation state}},{{/validLocation}} {{/validLocation}}{{#validLocation state}}{{#unless city}}in {{/unless}}{{uppercase state}}{{/validLocation}}
Important! PeopleLooker uses real public records. The information may be surprising.












Less than 30 seconds remaining


Continue to Results 







Now
We look up all people named {{nameize fn}} {{nameize ln}}.




Next
You pick which one you're looking for.




Then
We search our database for info on them.




Hooray!
You get your report!












Where does {{nameize fn}}{{#if mi}} {{uppercase mi}}{{/if}} {{nameize ln}}
live?
Please help us narrow down your search











All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





I'm not sure














Please enter a full name
Please help us narrow down your search







First Name:

Please Enter First Name


Last Name:

Please Enter Last Name












































People Searching Made Easy! | PeopleLooker
































Looking to Find Out About Someone?

Find information you may not get on Google.












State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





Search





We respect your privacy.













We've run over


1,000,000


background reports!
Successful background reports!









Access Premium Public Records

Quickly search public records that could otherwise take you weeks or months
to collect. Find friends, relatives, neighbors, or even yourself. Comprehensive
people search reports may contain:




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records




Relatives
Email Addresses
Much More!




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth
Relatives
Email Addresses




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records
Much More!







The New Way to Find People
More than a regular search engine.

It's the quick and easy way to look people up. Do a deep public record
search to uncover the important information you're looking for. Now you'll
never have to search someone on google again.





































People Searching Made Easy! | PeopleLooker
































Looking to Find Out About Someone?

Find information you may not get on Google.












State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





Search





We respect your privacy.













We've run over


1,000,000


background reports!
Successful background reports!









Access Premium Public Records

Quickly search public records that could otherwise take you weeks or months
to collect. Find friends, relatives, neighbors, or even yourself. Comprehensive
people search reports may contain:




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records




Relatives
Email Addresses
Much More!




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth
Relatives
Email Addresses




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records
Much More!







The New Way to Find People
More than a regular search engine.

It's the quick and easy way to look people up. Do a deep public record
search to uncover the important information you're looking for. Now you'll
never have to search someone on google again.





































People Searching Made Easy! | PeopleLooker
































Looking to Find Out About Someone?

Find information you may not get on Google.












State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





Search





We respect your privacy.













We've run over


1,000,000


background reports!
Successful background reports!









Access Premium Public Records

Quickly search public records that could otherwise take you weeks or months
to collect. Find friends, relatives, neighbors, or even yourself. Comprehensive
people search reports may contain:




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records




Relatives
Email Addresses
Much More!




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth
Relatives
Email Addresses




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records
Much More!







The New Way to Find People
More than a regular search engine.

It's the quick and easy way to look people up. Do a deep public record
search to uncover the important information you're looking for. Now you'll
never have to search someone on google again.





































People Searching Made Easy! | PeopleLooker
































Looking to Find Out About Someone?

Find information you may not get on Google.












State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





Search





We respect your privacy.













We've run over


1,000,000


background reports!
Successful background reports!









Access Premium Public Records

Quickly search public records that could otherwise take you weeks or months
to collect. Find friends, relatives, neighbors, or even yourself. Comprehensive
people search reports may contain:




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records




Relatives
Email Addresses
Much More!




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth
Relatives
Email Addresses




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records
Much More!







The New Way to Find People
More than a regular search engine.

It's the quick and easy way to look people up. Do a deep public record
search to uncover the important information you're looking for. Now you'll
never have to search someone on google again.





















